 
Application of traceability in deterrence of illegal, 
unreported and unregulated fishing: an analysis model of 
EU Regulation 1005/2008 and 
EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) 
 
By: Melania Bori? 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Master Thesis in International Fisheries Management 
(30 credits) 
Institute for Aquatic Bio-Science 
Norwegian College of Fishery Science 
University of Tromsø 
Norway 
 
May 2009 
 
 
 
 
 
 
I wish to thank: 
 
Jorge SANTOS, 
 for his excellent guidance, thorough commitment 
and perfect supervision; 
 
Emily ANDREWS-CHOUICHA (OECD), 
Marianne BRANDT (ICES), Duncan COPELAND (EJF), 
Peter FLEWWELLING (NFDS), Petter OLSEN (NOFIMA), 
Claire WELLING (ICES), Peter ØREBECH (NFH, UiTø), 
for their priceless help; 
 
Silvia BUDU, 
for her daily moral support; 
 
Cornel BORI?, 
 for his accurate proofreading, 
precious support and understanding; 
 
my MOTHER and my FATHER, 
for everything. 
 
 
 
ABSTRACT 
Illegal, unreported and unregulated (IUU) fishing is one important concern of fisheries managers 
and consumers alike all over the world. Recent IUU fishing deterrence strategies consider 
traceability the most promising indirect method to prevent its occurrence. Two of the three new 
pillars of the European Union Common Fisheries Policy (EU Regulation 1005/2008; EU Regulation 
Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS)) were explicitly developed to address this concern. These regulations 
attempt to introduce market monitoring measures that prevent IUU fish from entering legitimate 
trade channels in the Community. The leading purpose of this study was twofold: to analyse if the 
traceability related provisions of these two legal documents are relevant for IUU fishing deterrence, 
and to test if they fulfil de lege lata the traceability requirements of the chain of custody. In order to 
achieve these aims, a novel analytical tool that was suitable for the dual purposes had to be 
constructed. Model 1 was conceived to identify the overlapping of the necessary data for identifying 
IUU components (actors or products) with the traceability data recorded in the documentation 
imposed by the legal provisions at each critical traceability control point. Model 2 was designed to 
identify the fulfilment of the chain of custody requirements along the traceability control points. 
The present findings indicate that the traceability data retained according to the new legal EU norms 
have little relevance to be used effectively in deterrence of IUU operations. The product data are not 
constantly recorded at each critical traceability point, and important information to help identify 
IUU fishing actors and products is not retained. Similarly, the system put into place by both legal 
documents does not fulfil the requirements of a traceability scheme. Unique identification is not 
given to trade units, thus hindering their traceability along the supply chain. Furthermore, chain of 
custody requirements are scant, allowing IUU fish to infiltrate the trade through the exposed links 
of the chain. Although the two analytical models utilized are preliminary, they can be further 
developed to improve comprehensiveness and depth of scrutiny. Further, both models are replicable 
and flexible, as they can be used to analyse any legal text that puts into place a traceability system 
for the fish supply chain. Model 1 can be applied on single documents required by traceability 
systems at any critical traceability control point. Model 2 can be used to analyse a self standing 
traceability system implemented by any company. The models developed and the main findings of 
the study are of interest to both Community and third-country entities involved in a way or another 
in IUU fishing deterrence, traceability in fish supply chains or legislation development. Future 
studies should focus on the design of a traceability system for fishery products that fits the purpose 
of IUU fishing deterrence under a de lege ferenda approach. 
Key-words: traceability; IUU fishing; chain of custody; critical control point; EU Regulation 
1005/2008; EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), de lege lata. 
You are kindly requested to contact the author? prior to citing the present material. 
 
? melania.borit@yahoo.com 
 
 
 
TABLE OF CONTENTS 
 
LIST OF FIGURES AND TABLES ??????????.??????????....1 
 
ABBREVIATIONS ?????????????????????????..??.2 
 
1. INTRODUCTION ???????????????????????????4 
1.1 Settings ????????????????????????????4 
1.2 Problems to address and research questions ??????????????4 
1.3 Approach ???????????????????????????.6 
1.3.1 Constraints ???????????????????????6 
1.3.2 Research strategy, theory, hypothesis, objective ????????..7 
1.3.3 Methodology ??????????????????????7 
1.4 Structure of the paper ??????????????????????..7 
 
2. ILLEGAL, UNREPORTED AND UNREGULATED FISHING ?????????9 
2.1 Background ??????????????????????????..9 
2.1.1 Definitions ???????????????????????9 
2.1.2 State of art in IUU fishing ????????????????..12 
2.1.3 The extent of IUU fishing in EU ??????????????13 
2.2 Drivers of IUU fishing ?????????????????????...15 
2.3 Management measures in place against IUU fishing ??????????16 
2.4 Compliance with FAO Code of Conduct for Responsible 
 Fisheries requirements with respect to IUU fishing ??????????..18 
 
3. TRACEABILITY 
3.1 Definitions of traceability, categories and drivers ???????????.24 
3.1.1 Definitions ??????????????????????..24 
3.1.2 Categories ??????????????????????...25 
3.2 Legislation, standardisation, certification and eco-labelling ???????.28 
3.2.1 Legislation ??????????????????????..28 
3.2.2 Standardisation ????????????????????...30 
 
 
3.2.3 Certification ??????????????????????31 
3.2.4 Eco-labelling ?????????????????????...32 
3.1 Traceability systems ??????????????????????..34 
3.3.1 Types of systems ????????????????????.34 
3.3.2 Components ??????????????????????35 
3.3.3 Characteristics ?????????????????????.36 
3.3.4 Traceable units ?????????????????????37 
3.3.5 Data recording of unique ID-codes starting from lowest unit ???38 
3.3.6 The importance of weighing ???????????????...40 
3.3.7 Transformations/operations ????????????????41 
3.3.8 Critical traceability control points ?????????????..43 
3.4 Analytical methods used in fish traceability investigations ???????..45 
 
4. TRACEABILITY AND IUU FISHING DETERRENCE, ANALYSIS OF LINKS ?...47 
4.1 Introduction ??????????????????????????47 
4.2 Method: description, materials, premises, limitations, suggestions ????...47 
4.2.1 General methodology and materials ?????????????47 
4.2.2 Model 1: Acquisition of IUU fishing identification 
 data by means of traceability ???????????????..48 
4.2.3 Model 2: Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability ?.52 
4.3 Results ????????????????????????????53 
4.3.1 Output ????????????????????????..53 
4.3.2 Model 1: Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data 
 by means of traceability results ??????????????...57 
4.3.3 Model 2: Assurance of chain of custody by 
 means of traceability results ????????????????60 
 
5. DISCUSSION AND CONCLUSIONS ??????????????????...61 
5.1 Discussion ??????????????????????????..61 
5.1.1 The Models ??????????????????????..61 
5.1.2 Eco-labelling and IUU fish traceability ???????????..63 
5.1.3 Authentication/genetic traceability and IUU fishing deterrence ??.64 
5.1.4 Facilitating the traceability of fishery products ????????..66 
5.2 Conclusions ?????????????????????????...67 
 
 
 
REFERENCES ?????????????????????????????69 
 
APPENDIX 1: Potential impacts of IUU fishing ????????????????73 
 
APPENDIX 2: Groups of important economic and 
 social drivers of IUU fishing activities ?????????????...74 
 
APPENDIX 3: Available measures against IUU fishing activities ?????????.75 
 
APPENDIX 4: Relevant EU legislation for fish supply chain ???????????77 
 
APPENDIX 5: Standards, certification schemes and 
 labels operating in fisheries and aquaculture ???????????.78 
 
APPENDIX 6. Guide to unique identification of traceable units ??????????79 
 
APPENDIX 7: Additional types of operations/transformations of traceable units 
 and data addition and un-grouping ???????????????.82 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 1  
LIST OF FIGURES AND TABLES 
 
FIGURES: 
 
Figure 1: Illustration of types of IUU fishing activities. PAGE 11. 
Figure 2: Estimated global fish landings 1950-2004, including estimates of different types 
of IUU fishing. PAGE 11. 
Figure 3: Global incidence of illegal fishing (based on data from 1980-2003). PAGE 12. 
Figure 4: Summary of estimated IUU fishing costs of all EU Member states for the IUU 
activities carried in EU?s waters. PAGE 14. 
Figure 5: The Large Marine Ecosystems adjacent to the coastlines of EU Member States 
and the amount of IUU fishing activities done by EU and non-EU vessels inside EU EEZs. 
PAGE 14. 
Figure 6: Relationship between the amount of illegal and un-reported fishing (expressed as 
a proportion of the reported catch that is additionally taken as illegal and unreported catch) 
and an average of four World Bank indices of governance (Government Effectiveness, 
Regulatory Quality, Rule of Law and Control of Corruption), measured in 2003. PAGE 16. 
Figure 7. The chain of IUU fishing operations. PAGE 17. 
Figure 8. ?Codeometer? showing estimated overall compliance of the top 53 marine 
fishing countries FAO (UN) Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries. PAGE 19. 
Figure 9. Bar chart showing compliance with the Code of Conduct in controlling illegal 
fishing for the 53 top fishing countries. PAGE 20. 
Figure 10. Country scores on ?Are vessels fishing illegally in the fisheries?? PAGE 21. 
Figure 11. Countries scores on ?How effective is control of access to stop illegal fishing?? 
PAGE 22. 
Figure 12. Average scores for effectiveness of observer schemes, catch inspections and 
vessel monitoring. PAGE 22. 
Figure 13. Traceability along the food supply chain. Filled arrows show the product flow; 
open arrows show the information flow. PAGE 25. 
Figure 14. External and internal traceability, downstream and upstream. PAGE 27. 
Figure 15. Traceability drivers in food sector. PAGE 28. 
Figure 16. Summary of chain of custody from a certified fishery throughout to consumer. 
PAGE 33. 
 
 - 2 Figure 17. Fundamental structure of a traceability system. PAGE 36. 
Figure 18. Relation between internal batch and external trade unit. PAGE 38. 
Figure 19. Trade units flow. PAGE 40. 
Figure 20. IUU fish entering points into the legitimate fish supply chain. 
Figure 21. Decision tree to identify critical traceability points in the fish supply chain. 
 
TABLES 
 
Table 1 A. Traceability systems: purpose, objective, attributes, standards and examples. 
PAGE 34. 
Table 1 B. Supplement to traceability systems: purpose, objective, attributes, standards and 
examples. PAGE 35. 
Table 2. Traceable units: trade unit, logistic unit, batch. PAGE 37. 
Table 3. Operations/transformations and their exposure to infiltration with IUU fishery 
products. PAGE 41. 
Table 4. Output of Model 1: Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by means of 
traceability. Analysis of EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS). PAGE 54. 
Table 5. Output of Model 1: Acquiring IUU fishing identification data by means of 
traceability. Analysis of EU Regulation 1005/2008. PAGE 55. 
Table 6. Output of Model 2: Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability. 
Analysis of EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS). 
PAGE 56 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 3  
ABBREVIATIONS 
 
ACP states - alternately called the Group of African, Caribbean and Pacific countries, are 
 the countries that are signatories of the Lomé Convention with the European 
 Commission (48 African, 16 Caribbean and 15 Pacific countries). 
AIS ? automatic information system. 
CFP - Common Fisheries Policy. 
CTCP - critical traceability control point. 
EU - European Union. 
FAO - Food and Agricultural Organization of the United Nations. 
IPOA-IUU - International Plan of Action to Prevent, Deter and Eliminate Illegal, 
 Unreported and Unregulated Fishing. 
ISO - International Standard Organization. 
IUU - illegal, unreported and unregulated . 
LU ? logistic unit. 
MCS ? Monitoring, Control and Surveillance. 
OECD - Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development. 
RFMO - regional fisheries management organization. 
TU ? trade unit. 
UNCLOS ? United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea. 
VDS ? vessel detecting system. 
VMS ? vessel monitoring system. 
WWF - World Wildlife Fund for Nature. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 4  
1. INTRODUCTION 
 
1.1 Settings 
By nature, the extent of un-controlled fishing is difficult to quantify. But, as suggested by 
the Food and Agricultural Organization of the United Nations (FAO) in 2001, the problem 
of illegal, unreported and unregulated (IUU) fishing in world fisheries is of serious and 
increasing concern. Some claim that by the beginning of the 21st Century, almost 30% of 
the global fish catch could be counted as IUU in its diverse forms, with a total catch value 
of nearly 1.500 million USD1. When confronted with IUU fishing, weak national and 
regional fisheries management organizations that strive to achieve sound management 
goals may fail. Possible and logical consequences are the loss of both short and long-term 
social and economic opportunities, and negative effects on food security and 
environmental protection. Un-confronted IUU fishing can lead to the collapse of a fishery 
or seriously impair efforts to rebuild stocks that have already been depleted. Existing 
international instruments addressing IUU fishing have not been effective due to a lack of 
political will, priority, capacity and resources to ratify or accede to and implement them2. 
By introducing fish traceability in the fisheries sector, it is believed that it will be possible 
to check more closely what enters production and what leaves at the other end, confronting 
thereby IUU fishing, and improving the fisheries management at all levels. 
 
The central notions of the present paper are IUU fishing and traceability, as defined in the 
FAO International Plan of Action to Prevent, Deter and Eliminate Illegal, Unreported and 
Unregulated Fishing (2001), and respectively by the International Standard Organization 
(ISO) and the European Union (EU). 
 
1.2 Problems to address and research questions 
The purpose of this study is to analyse if the traceability related provisions of two new EU 
legal instruments, the EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 
(CNS), are relevant and sufficient to prevent and deter IUU fishing and to fulfil the 
traceability requirements of the chain of custody. 
 
 
1 Sumaila, R. (2008). 
2 FAO (2001) 1. 
 
 - 5 EU Regulation 1005/2008 establishing a Community system to prevent, deter and eliminate 
illegal, unreported and unregulated fishing. 
- Type: regulation. 
- Date of entry to force: 29.10.2008. 
- Date of application: 01.01.2010. 
- In what concerns the catch certificate, it applies to all fish to be imported/exported to/from 
EU. 
- It is considered to be one of the most important legal steps in deterring the IUU 
operations, both inside and outside the Community?s waters. 
 
EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) establishing a Community control system for 
ensuring compliance with the rules of the Common Fisheries Policy. 
- Type: proposal for a regulation. 
- Date of entry to force: unknown; it will be the day following its publication in the Official 
Journal of the EU. Most probably the text will be published in the second semester of 2009. 
- Date of application: 01.01.2010. If the norm is not published in the Official Journal of the 
EU by the end of 2009, its date of application will be postponed. 
- It refers to operations related to Community fishing vessels. 
- It enforces trade controls that should prevent products obtained through IUU operations 
from entering the fish supply chain of the EU. 
 
The two legal documents created by the EU were selected for analysis as they constitute the 
new pillars of the Union?s Common Fisheries Policy (CFP). Their impact on the EU 
relations with third-countries and on the international trade with fishery products is yet not 
fully assessed. Nevertheless, it is believed that these legal instruments put in place a 
comprehensive traceability system that will prevent IUU fish entering EU trade, and thus 
help deterring IUU activities elsewhere, as well. 
 
Related issues such as eco-labelling and genetic traceability are also included in the present 
analysis, for the sake of relatedness and complementarity. 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 6 The following research questions are addressed by this study: 
 
- primary research questions: 
 How can a model be developed in order to analyse the connexion between IUU fishing 
deterrence and the fish traceability put in place by the EU Regulation 1005/2008 and 
EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS)? 
 What is the law (EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 
(CNS)) in what concerns traceability issues? 
 What are the limitations of the fish traceability put in place by the EU Regulation 
1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) to deter IUU fishing? 
 
- secondary research questions: 
 What is the connexion between eco-labelling and IUU fish traceability? 
 What is the connexion between genetic traceability and IUU fishing deterrence? 
 
1.3 Approach 
1.3.1 Constraints 
Due to the breadth of the topic, the paper will focus only on the theoretical, legal and some 
operational aspects of the following issues: IUU fishing operations and the relevance of the 
market/trade management measures; IUU fishing in EU; traceability systems (including 
eco-labelling and genetic traceability); and the new EU legislation related to deterrence of 
IUU fishing by means of fish traceability (EU Regulation 1005/2008; EU Regulation 
Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS)). 
 
It is not an ambition of the present work to address other national or regional policies, 
legislation or operational initiatives other than those mentioned above. Neither, given the 
limited scope of the research work, may the paper compare the mentioned EU legislation 
to other Community traceability related norms, nor assesses its relations to the relevant 
international law. Moreover, the paper does not describe traceability standards in order to 
evaluate or improve them, but only to assess if the new EU legal documents meet their 
requirements. Further, this is a descriptive study and the provision of advice for 
improvement of the traceability system proposed through the provisions of EU Regulation 
1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) would be out of bounds. 
Furthermore, the paper does not assess the applicability, the implementation or 
 
 - 7 enforcement of the regulations. Finally, the paper is not a de lege ferenda type of study as 
it does not provide advice about how the traceability regulations comprised in the two 
norms should be. What this paper is about, is presenting the law as it is, thus being a de 
lege lata type of study. 
 
1.3.2 Research strategy, theory, hypothesis, objective 
The research strategy used is abductive reasoning (?application of traceability entails 
reduction of IUU fishing?) in the context of an interdisciplinary approach that combines 
data from biology, juridical sciences, forensics, and economics. At the same time, this 
paper is constructed on the descriptive theory paradigm, therefore it describes and 
interprets how things are, but not how they should be, starting from the presumption that 
fish traceability will in the future be the indirect tool of excellence to eliminate IUU fish 
from the EU trade. 
 
1.3.3 Methodology 
In order to achieve the proposed goal, a mixture of qualitative and quantitative methods 
was used: doctrinal (theoretical) and non-doctrinal (descriptive) legal research; secondary 
data analysis; qualitative data analysis; case study; informal interviews. In order to achieve 
the aim of the paper two models were designed. Model 1 was conceived to identify the 
overlapping of the necessary data for identifying IUU components (actors or products) 
with the traceability data recorded in the documentation imposed by the legal provisions at 
each critical traceability control point. Model 2 was designed to identify the fulfilment of 
the requirements of the chain of custody along the traceability control points. Identifiers of 
IUU fishing activities were constructed, necessary traceability parameters were included, 
critical traceability control points were identified along the fishery products chain of 
custody, and chain of custody standards were designated. All these entries were plotted 
against the new legal requirements, and the qualitative rating displayed in case-ordered 
predictor-outcome N-way matrices. The specific methodology followed in order to 
construct the analytical models is presented in Chapter 4. 
 
1.4 Structure of the paper 
Chapter 2 defines IUU fishing, illustrates the actual extension of the problem, and 
describes its drivers and market/trade counter-measures, all with the purpose of framing 
the conditions for proper application of traceability schemes. 
 
 - 8  
Chapter 3 defines traceability, circumscribes its drivers, its legal framework, standards, 
certification schemes, and implications for eco-labelling. The conventional traceability 
system is described and some analytical methods are exemplified in order to first 
understand this general concept before finding its application in fisheries management. 
 
Following the presentation of general issues related to IUU operations and traceability, an 
attempt to intersect the two and define their common grounds within the framework of EU 
Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) is made in Chapter 
4. The analysis and discussion sections identify how the new legal provisions deal with 
traceability in connexion with IUU fishing deterrence, and if they fit the purpose they were 
designed for. A comprehensive model that summarizes the findings displayed in matrices 
is designed. Finally, the findings of the two Models, the connexions between eco-labelling 
and IUU fish traceability, and genetic traceability and IUU fishing deterrence are 
addressed in Chapter 5. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 9  
2. ILLEGAL, UNREPORTED AND UNREGULATED FISHING 
 
2.1 Background 
2.1.1 Definitions 
Commonly referred to as ?pirate fishing?, the illegal, unreported and unregulated (IUU) 
fishing comprises a broad range of activities3, and a more specific characterization of the 
term is called upon. Domestically, fishing without a licence, out of season, or prohibited 
species, using banned types of fishing gear, catching more fish than is allowed, and not 
reporting or misreporting catch weights are all examples of deceitful behaviour and IUU 
activities. Internationally, fishing contrary to the fisheries conservation and management 
measures of a regional fisheries management organization (RFMO), or fishing in a State?s 
jurisdictional waters without authorization, are more examples of IUU fishing. 
 
The only internationally agreed definition of IUU fishing is found in the International Plan 
of Action to Prevent, Deter and Eliminate Illegal, Unreported and Unregulated Fishing 
(IPOA-IUU), a voluntary binding instrument adopted by the Food and Agricultural 
Organisation of the United Nations (FAO) in 2001. This followed from the framework set 
by the FAO Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries (1995). Later, in 2008, the 
European Union (EU) agreed upon a similar definition of IUU fishing, which was included 
in the Council Regulation 1005/20084 establishing a Community system to prevent, deter 
and eliminate IUU fishing. 
 
According to the provisions of Article 3 IPOA-IUU5, the following fishing activities are 
considered as illegal: fishing ?conducted by national or foreign vessels in waters under the 
jurisdiction of a State, without the permission of that State, or in contravention of its laws 
and regulations; fishing conducted by vessels flying the flag of States that are parties to a 
relevant regional fisheries management organization but operate in contravention of the 
conservation and management measures adopted by that organization and by which the 
States are bound, or relevant provisions of the applicable international law; or in violation 
 
3 EJF (2005), page 2. 
4 Council Regulation (EC) No 1005/2008 of 29.10.2008 establishing a Community system to prevent, deter 
and eliminate illegal, unreported and unregulated fishing, amending Regulations (EEC) No 2847/93, (EC) No 
1936/2001 and (EC) No 601/2004 and repealing Regulations (EC) No 1093/94 and (EC) No 1447/1999, 
published in on 29.10.2008 in the Official Journal of the European Union L 286/1. 
5 FAO (2001) 1. 
 
 - 10 of national laws or international obligations, including those undertaken by co-operating 
States to a relevant regional fisheries management organization.? 
 
Fishing activities ?which have not been reported, or have been misreported, to the relevant 
national authority, in contravention of national laws and regulations; or undertaken in the 
area of competence of a relevant regional fisheries management organization which have 
not been reported or have been misreported, in contravention of the reporting procedures of 
that organization? are defined as unreported. 
 
According to the same provisions, fishing activities ?in the area of application of a relevant 
regional fisheries management organization that are conducted by vessels without 
nationality, or by those flying the flag of a State not party to that organization, or by a 
fishing entity, in a manner that is not consistent with or contravenes the conservation and 
management measures of that organization? are considered unregulated. Likewise are 
considered fishing activities ?in areas or for fish stocks in relation to which there are no 
applicable conservation or management measures and where such fishing activities are 
conducted in a manner inconsistent with State responsibilities for the conservation of living 
marine resources under international law?. 
 
Taking a step forward, the EU Regulation 1005/2008 widens in Article 3(1) the concept of 
fishing vessel engaged in IUU fishing, by presuming that a fishing vessel is carrying out 
this kind of activities if it is proved that: 
- it has falsified or concealed its markings, identity or registration; 
- concealed, tampered with or disposed of evidence relating to an investigation; 
- obstructed the work of inspectors checking compliance with applicable 
conservation and management measures; 
- transhipped or landed undersized fish; 
- transhipped from, supported ore re-supplied other fishing vessels identified as 
having engaged in IUU fishing. 
 
 
 
 
 - 11 Figure 1 is an illustration of types of IUU fishing based on the above definitions. Within an 
EEZ, there may be unlicensed fishing (poaching), under- or non-reported, or unauthorised 
fishing by area, season, gear, quota or species. Outside EEZs there may be non-compliance 
with an RFMO, or there may be unregulated fishing outside the area of an RFMO. Many 
RFMOs also cover adjoining 
EEZ waters, but the primary 
jurisdiction in these cases 
remains that of the coastal 
state so the RFMO was 
drawn as bounding on EEZ 
waters.6 
 
 
Figure 17: Illustration of types 
of IUU fishing activities. 
 
 
Although the seriousness of infraction may vary from fishery to fishery, the extent of IUU 
fishing is not insignificant: it has been estimated that almost 25% of the fish landed in 
2004 was caught in 
a manner that can 
be defined as IUU 
fishing8 (Figure 2). 
 
 
Figure 29: Estimated 
global fish landings 
1950-2004, including 
estimates of different 
types of IUU fishing. 
 
 
6 MRAG (2005), page 11. 
7 MRAG (2005), page 11. 
8 MRAG & University of British Columbia (2008), page 17. 
9 Sumaila, R. (2008), page 5. 
 
 - 12 2.1.2 State of art in IUU fishing10 
In its broadest sense, IUU fishing is a worldwide issue, affecting both domestic waters and 
high seas, all types of fishing vessels, regardless of their size or type of gear, and a 
multitude of species, with global (e.g. tuna and tuna-like species) or local (e.g. Patagonian 
toothfish) impact (Figure 3). As underlined by FAO already in 200111, IUU fishing 
undermines efforts to conserve and manage fish stocks in many regulated fisheries. When 
confronted with this problem, national and regional fisheries management organizations 
can fail to achieve management goals, the situation ultimately leading to the collapse of a 
fishery, or seriously impairing efforts to rebuild depleted stocks. In addition, IUU fishing 
activities may have negative impacts on the marine ecosystem, through their direct or 
indirect effects on the populations of seabirds, marine mammals, sea turtles and biodiversity as a whole (discards, by-catch). 
 
Figure 312: Global incidence of illegal fishing (based on data from 1980-2003). 
 
Moreover, IUU fishing may alter competition and put at risk the economic survival of 
those who fish in accordance with the law and in compliance with relevant conservation 
and management measures. Therefore, IUU fishing may bear important social costs, 
affecting the food-security and livelihoods of fishing-dependent countries and 
communities. Because many of the crewmembers on IUU fishing vessels are themselves 
from poor and underdeveloped regions, often working in inadequate social and safety 
 
10 Based on OECD (2004), pages 11-12. 
11 FAO (2001) 1. 
12 Sumaila, R. (2008), page 8. 
 
 - 13 conditions, the socio-economic problem is two-sided and complex. For an overview of the 
most important indicators and shocks borne of IUU fishing activities, see Appendix 1. 
 
One conclusion reached by the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development 
(OECD) Workshop on IUU fishing activities (2004) is that IUU fishing is a dynamic and 
multi-faceted problem, and that no single strategy is sufficient to eliminate or reduce it. 
Therefore, a concerted and multi-divided approach is required nationally, regionally and 
internationally, and by type of fishery. In order to find viable solutions to the IUU fishing 
problem, all actors should be involved in the process: governments, communities, NGOs, 
and the private sector. 
 
The FAO IPOA-IUU contains tools to tackle the IUU fishing issue, but the question is to 
find better ways to implement these tools and to make all countries (developed or 
developing) responsible in complying with their duties as flag states, port states, coastal 
states, states of vessel owners and trading nations. 
 
2.1.3 The extent of IUU fishing in EU 
Marine fishing and associated processing and commerce are important industries for a 
number of coastal communities in the EU. IUU fishing, in various forms, is a significant 
threat to achieving biologically sustainable fisheries and a serious management problem 
for a large number of the fisheries on which these industries and coastal communities 
depend. As shown in Figure 4, the IUU fishing activities bear a high social, economical 
and environmental cost, as the percentage of fish caught in activities defined as IUU 
fishing is considerably high (Figure 5). 
 
The volume of illegal fisheries products imported each year into the EU has been assessed 
to amount approximately 500.000 tons for a value of 1,1 billion euro13 regardless if the 
place of capture was inside or outside the Community?s waters. 
 
 
13 http://www.eubusiness.com/Fisheries/iuu-fishing-eu/ (accessed: 07.05.2009). 
 
 - 14  
Figure 414: Summary of estimated IUU fishing costs of all EU Member States for the IUU 
activities carried in EU?s waters. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Figure 515: The Large Marine Ecosystems adjacent to the coastlines of EU Member States and the 
amount of IUU fishing activities done by EU and non-EU vessels inside EU?s EEZs (IUU rates are 
expressed as a percentage of a fishery?s total catch). 
 
14 EFTEC (2008), page 69. The study reviews evidence on the rates of IUU fishing in European waters, and 
on the costs associated with IUU fishing activities. The study develops a simulation model for fisheries at the 
Large Marine Ecosystem (LME) scale, using a surplus production model applied at the level of key 
commercial groups (cod-likes, perch-likes, herring-likes, tuna and billfishes) in each LME, representing 46% 
of the value of European fishing. 
15 EFTEC (2008), page 9. 
 
 - 15 2.2 Drivers of IUU fishing activities 
Attempts have been made to identify and address the drivers of IUU fishing, with 
particular regard to its illegal and unreported (IU) components. Starting from the precept 
that ?expected profits from IUU fishing = expected benefits from IUU - expected costs of 
IUU?, in 2005, the OECD?s Committee for Fisheries identified groups of important 
economic and social drivers of IUU fishing activities (Appendix 2). Among these, the 
market value of the IUU fish can be considered the decisive one, as without it most of the 
others would be annihilated. 
 
Responses in the global survey demonstrate the significant economic gains available 
through IUU fishing. Demand for fish as a healthy, wholesome food is increasing in all 
parts of the world and, in a paradoxal way, the more legal fishing is constrained by catch 
and effort limits ? as the overall state of global fish stocks requires in many cases ? the 
greater the motivation for and gains from IUU fishing.16 
 
Since there are strong economic drivers for IUU fishing, and it occurs in situations of poor 
fisheries management and control, one might expect that the level of illegal fishing should 
be related mostly to fish price, governance and indicators of the control problem, such as 
the area of a country's EEZ and the number of patrol vessels at its disposal. In fact, in a 
study conducted in 200817 with respect to illegal and unreported fishing, no significant 
relationship was found between these activities and the price of fish or the size of the EEZ 
or of the fishery. Nevertheless, a significant relationship between the IU fishing and the 
World Bank governance indicators could be established for all fisheries across Africa, Asia 
and Europe (Figure 6). 
 
The result does not imply that developing countries with poor governance records are 
necessarily to blame for IU fishing, but that they are more vulnerable to this kind of 
activities, conducted by both their own fishermen and vessels from distant water fishing 
nations (e.g. fishing vessels from China, EU or Russia conducting IU activities in African 
states waters). This represents a failure of control on behalf of the flag state as well as the 
coastal state. 
 
16 Bray, K (2000), page 1. 
17 Agnew, DJ; Pearce, J.; Pramod, G.; Peatman, T; Watson, R. et al. (2009). 
 
 - 16 Furthermore, many vessels engaged in both illegal and unreported activities on one hand, 
and unregulated on the other, are registered under ?flags of convenience? states. While 
these states are in most cases developing countries, the vessels themselves are usually 
owned and operated by developed countries companies. 
 
Figure 618: Relationship between the amount of illegal and un-reported fishing (expressed as a 
proportion of the reported catch that is additionally taken as illegal and unreported catch) and an 
average of four World Bank indices of governance (Government Effectiveness, Regulatory 
Quality, Rule of Law and Control of Corruption), measured in 2003. 
 
2.3 Management measures in place against IUU fishing 
Even though the high seas are open to all states, the freedom to fish is limited by the basic 
conditions set out in the UN Convention on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS) (1982). In 
addition to UNCLOS, the current international instruments related to high seas fisheries 
are the FAO Compliance Agreement (1993), the UN Fish Stock Agreement (1995), the 
FAO Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries (1995), and the FAO IPOA - IUU (2001). 
While the first two are legally binding international instruments containing requirements 
 
18 Agnew, DJ; Pearce, J.; Pramod, G.; Peatman, T; Watson, R. et al. (2009). 
 
 - 17 relating to flag State responsibilities, compliance and enforcement, the last two are 
voluntary and management-oriented instruments. 
 
Analysing the structure of an IUU operation (Figure 7), one can break down this kind of 
process into three segments19, and each of them can be targeted by measures specially 
designed for it: 
- first, fishing vessel activity segment, from vessel registration to landing of fish at a 
port. This is the ?at sea? segment, which corresponds largely to what is understood 
by ?IUU fishing?. 
- second, the logistical aspect of an IUU operation addresses the organisation of 
supplies and services (re-fuelling, transhipment, change of crew etc.). 
- third, the catch/product in trade and market segment. This is where income-flows 
occur and net incomes are generated, and this is the main purpose and driving force 
for IUU operations. 
 
Figure 720. The chain of 
IUU fishing operations. 
 
A management measure 
configured to address an 
IUU operation effectively 
would need to deal with all 
three segments of the 
phenomenon, and would 
have to exploit potentials to 
cut across these segments. 
Appendix 3 provides an 
overview of the most 
important tools against IUU 
operations based on FAO 
Code of Conduct and FAO 
IPOA-IUU. 
 
19 OECD (2004), page 22. 
20 OECD (2004), page 21. 
 
 - 18 Among these tools, the market and trade related measures have a clear potential to address 
all the three aspects of the IUU operation. For example, by improvement of the 
transparency of the markets in order to allow the traceability of fish and fish products, IUU 
fish can be stopped form entering the trade (segment 3). At the same time, important 
information about IUU actors (vessel owners, beneficial ownership, importers, buyers, 
consumers, bankers, insurers, transhippers, equipment suppliers; IUU ports, IUU vessels) 
can be retrieved in order to eliminate them from fishing operations (segments 1 and 2). 
The traceability of fish and fish products can be enhanced by introducing mandatory 
controls of importation and exportation of goods (catch certification and trade 
documentation requirements), and import and export restrictions and prohibitions whose 
violation could be tracked. Eco-labelling could also be one cross-cut measure, as the 
certification of a fishery guarantees the absence of IUU activities at sea (segments 1 and 2), 
and the product chain of custody certification ensures that only non-IUU fishing products 
enter the trade (segment 3). 
 
2.4 Compliance with FAO Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries requirements 
with respect to IU fishing21 
The FAO Code of Conduct, together with the FAO IPOA-IUU, is considered one of the 
most important instrument containing tools to address IUU fishing. In 2005, WWF and the 
University of British Columbia Fisheries Centre initiated a project to assess the Code?s 
implementation, applying a consistent assessment protocol to data for 2003-2005 to 53 
countries, representing over 95% of the world?s wild fisheries catch. 
 
The conclusion of the report is that none of the 53 countries achieves what was considered 
a ?good? score of 70% or more (Figure 7). Only six countries (11%) have overall 
compliance scores whose confidence limits overlap 60% (Norway, USA, Canada, 
Australia, Iceland, Namibia). This means that, ten years after the Code of Conduct was 
agreed, there was a lot of space for improvement of governance and compliance even 
among those countries at the top end of the rankings. At the lower end, the alarming 
finding is that 28 countries (53%) had ?fail grades? of less than 40% (Peru, Poland, India, 
Ghana, Taiwan, Latvia, Philippines, Brazil, Argentina, Morocco, Pakistan, Russia, 
Senegal, Ecuador, Indonesia, Iran, Thailand, Ukraine, Sri Lanka, Viet Nam, Turkey, 
 
21 Based on Pitcher, T. J.; Kalikoski, D.; Pramod, G. and Short, K. (2008). 
 
 - 19 Bangladesh, Egypt, Yemen, Nigeria, Angola, Myanmar, North Korea). In the middle 
range, disappointing scores were obtained by most developed European nations with the 
undoubted resources and know-how to implement the Code. This reinforces the impression 
of the low political priority given to improving fisheries management internationally. Some 
developing countries score as fairly in the implementation of the Code as a developed 
European country, indicating that elements of good fishery management can be achieved 
even with limited resources. A negative 
relationship with a marine biodiversity index 
suggests that management is weakest in the most 
species rich jurisdictions. Although it is expected 
that the biodiversity index would be confounded 
with both economic and governance indicators 
(?poor countries are richer in biodiversity?), this 
fact suggests that implementation of good practices 
is easier where fisheries target intensively a lower 
number of species. 
 
Figure 822. ?Codeometer? showing estimated overall 
compliance of the top 53 marine fishing countries FAO 
Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries. Colours 
indicate good scores (70% and over), fail scores (40% 
and below) and intermediate values. 
 
In what concerns the compliance with the Code in 
terms of measures to be taken for deterring IUU 
fishing, the same report estimates that only 26% of 
the countries deal reasonably with illegal fishing 
activities, while most countries (60%) address the 
problem unsatisfactorily (Figure 9). It is worth to 
note that among the countries rated to effectively 
tackle illegal fishing there are only three EU states 
(out of 11 included in the study), and two EEA 
states. 
 
22 Pitcher, T. J.; Kalikoski, D.; Pramod, G. and Short, K. (2008), page 8. 
 
 - 20  
Figure 923. Bar chart showing compliance with the Code of Conduct in controlling illegal fishing 
for the 53 top fishing countries. Broken lines: green denotes ?good? compliance rating; red denotes 
?fail? rating. Note that even though the chart refers to illegal fishing, the study analyses it in terms 
of IUU fishing. There is sometimes confusion in the terminology, and issues are often confounded, 
but this should not detract from the generality of the results of the study cited. 
 
The results obtained by this study with respect to EU member states can be correlated with 
the ones found by another 2008 study24 that focused only on IUU fishing activities carried 
out inside Community?s waters. As shown in Figure 10, a high proportion of illegal 
activities25 take part in EU Member States. This goes together with a relatively poor score 
by EU Member States for their ability to control illegal fishing (Figure 11), substantially 
worse than the scores for Iceland and Norway (EEA countries), and similar or little better 
than for Morocco (developing country) and Turkey (intermediate country). 
 
 
23 Pitcher, T. J.; Kalikoski, D.; Pramod, G. and Short, K. (2008), page 13. 
24 EFTEC (2008). The study refers in this particular case of relating EU Member States fishing activities with 
IUU fishing to the Pitcher T, Kalikoski, D and Pramod, G (2008) ?Evaluations of Compliance with the FAO 
(UN) 
Code of Conduct for Responsible Fisheries? study available at 
www.fisheries.ubc.ca/publications/reports/report14_2.php. This later one used 44 questions for each country 
in which scoring was based on the assessment of 2332 separate analyses including: national legislation, 
international treaties, country synopses from FAO, country reports to FAO and by NGOs, websites of 
national fisheries agencies, NGO websites, literature, and information from fisheries experts. 
25 One should bear in mind that even though the figures relate only to illegal fishing, the study refers to them 
as connected to IUU fishing. As in the previous case, there is sometimes confusion in the terminology, and 
issues are often confounded, but this should not detract from the generality of the results of the study cited. 
 
 - 21 When analysing the figures, one should not pay attention to the exact scoring (e.g. score 10 
for Spain in Figure 10 would imply that 100% of the Spanish fishing fleet is undertaking 
illegal activities inside the Community?s waters), but to its overall significance (e.g. in 
Figure 10 the important issue is that too many of EU vessels are engaged in illegal 
operations inside the Community?s waters). 
 
Figure 1026. Country scores on ?Are vessels fishing illegally in the fisheries?? Bars indicate ranges 
of scores in the study. 
 
Member States? scores for the effectiveness of observer schemes, catch inspections, and 
vessel monitoring are 5.8, 4.5 and 4.8 respectively out of 10 (Figure 12), reflecting a poor 
standard of enforcement within the EU as compared to those enforced by the neighbouring 
EEA fishing countries in their home waters. As underlined in the report, the EU low to 
moderate standards of enforcement and follow-up influence the risk of detection of IUU 
activity and the expected penalties, which in turn lower the expected costs of engaging in 
IUU fishing. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
26 EFTEC (2008), page 18. 
 
 - 22  
Figure 1127: Countries scores on ?How effective is control of access to stop illegal fishing?? 
 
Figure 1228. Average scores for effectiveness of observer schemes, catch inspections and vessel 
monitoring. 
 
All these results should be read critically, as the severity of the infractions is not clearly 
defined in such an aggregated presentation of findings. However, in a cross-sectional 
perspective (across countries), the contrasting trend between illegal fishing (and by 
extension, of other forms of IUU) and the level of control and surveillance is clear. 
 
 
27 EFTEC (2008), page 18. 
28 EFTEC (2008), page 15. 
 
 - 23 In summary, at the core of the IUU fishing issue lays a number of drivers that Member 
States and the Community must seriously address. In the EU context, this encompasses 
such known problems as over-capacity, tradition and lack of alternatives to fishing by 
some, and a high demand for fish products by a generally wealthy population. The later 
also creates a drive to the import of IUU international fish commodities along food supply 
chains. It is also becoming increasingly evident that adequate control and surveillance, 
including aspects related to traceability, have a complementary role to play in the 
deterrence and prevention of irresponsible fishing. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 24  
3. TRACEABILITY 
 
3.1 Definitions of traceability, categories and drivers 
3.1.1 Definitions 
Even though the concept of traceability is relatively new, its acception changed in time. 
Therefore, different institutions with authority in this domain are still trying to thoroughly 
circumscribe it, as specialists in traceability are not really in full agreement with what 
traceability is and what is not.29 
 
a. International Organization of Standardization (ISO) 
One of the first definitions of traceability, a very practical one and often used, is found in 
the international standard ISO 8402:1994 Quality management and quality assurance ? 
Vocabulary: traceability is ?the ability to trace the history, application or location of an 
entity by means of recorded identifications? (my italics). In 2000, the International 
Organisation for Standardization withdrew this standard, replacing it with ISO 9000:2000 
Quality management systems - Guidelines for performance improvements, where 
traceability is defined in a less specific way as being ?the ability to trace the history, 
application or location of that which is under consideration? (my italics). Both standards 
include an additional clause which states that when relating to products, traceability 
specifically entails ?the origin of materials and parts, the processing history, and the 
distribution and location of the product after delivery?. The difference between the two 
definitions is that in the newer one ?recorded identifications? are no longer mentioned. 
According to ISO 8402, objective methods or instruments that give immediate values for 
entity properties (for instance, devices that measure fat, water content, alcohol content, 
colour, salinity etc. in food items) did not provide traceability. In contrast, according to the 
new definition of ISO 9000, they offer traceability. Therefore, sometimes, the objective 
methods and instruments are considered to provide traceability control mechanisms rather 
than traceability as such. For example, they are used to verify the claims made in the 
recorded identifications.30 
 
 
29 Discussions during Workshop ?Harmonizing methods for food traceability process mapping and 
cost/benefit calculations related to implementation of electronic traceability systems?, NOFIMA, Tromsø, 
Norway, 25-26.02.2009. 
30 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/ (accessed: 18.04.2008). 
 
 - 25 b. European Union 
Resembling more with the newer ISO standard, the European Community Regulation 
178/2002 General principles and requirements of food law defines traceability in Article 
3(15) as ?the ability to trace and follow a food, feed, food-producing animal or substance 
intended to be, or expected to be incorporated into a food or feed, through all stages of 
production, processing and distribution?.31 
 
c. FAO/WHO Codex Alimentarius 
Citing the Procedural Manual developed by the Codex Alimentarius Commission, the 
CAC/GL 60-2006 standard developed by FAO/WHO defines traceability/product tracing 
as ?the ability to follow the movement of a food through specified stage(s) of production, 
processing and distribution?32, thus being closer to the newer ISO standard. 
 
3.1.2 Categories 
Traceability can be distinguished into two interrelated categories: internal traceability and 
external or chain traceability33, graphically depicted in Figure 13. 
 
Figure 13.34 Traceability along the food supply chain. Filled arrows show the product flow; open 
arrows show the information flow. 
 
 
31 OJ L31/1/ 2002, page 8. 
32 CAC/GL 60-2006, page 1, at http://www.codexalimentarius.net/web/standard_list.do?lang=en (accessed: 
18.04.2009), and FAO/WHO (2008), page 20. 
33 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/ (accessed: 18.04.2008). 
34 Randrup, M. et al. (2008), page 1065. 
 
 - 26 Internal traceability refers to the ability to keep track of what happens to a product, its 
ingredients and packaging within a company or production facility. For example, when a 
company receives a box of mackerel, and uses the fish to produce flavoured smoked 
mackerel, it has to keep records from whom the fish was received, if the fish was divided 
in batches or mixed with other received raw material, what smoking process was used 
(cold or warm smoking), what ingredients were used and where did they come from, where 
the finished product packing came from, where the finished product goes. External 
traceability refers to the ability to keep track of what happens to a product, its ingredients 
and packaging in the entire or part of a supply chain35. For example, if a customer in a 
supermarket wants to know if the purchased fish was caught by trawl or long line, it should 
be possible to find this information with an external traceability system. 
 
Using a metaphor36, the concept of traceability can be compared with a train track that 
crosses all the points of the supply chain (harvesting - primary processor - secondary 
processor - retailer), while the train carriages are the information retained at each of these 
points by means of internal traceability. Traceability downstream (back) can be called 
?tracing? and upstream (forward) ?tracking?37. 
 
In practice, the term traceability can be used in distinct contexts, each with a different 
implied sense38: 
1. Product; it may relate materials, their origin, processing history, and their distribution 
and location after delivery. 
2. Data; it relates calculations and data generated throughout the quality loop, sometimes 
back to the requirements for quality; it relates to transformation information 
(identification+transformation relations) and product information (origin+processing 
history+location).39 
3. IT and programming; it relates design and implementation back to the requirements for 
a system. 
 
 
35 The supply chain can be defined as ?the entire chain the product travels through from raw materials to 
consumption? (http://www.bordbiavantage.ie/bordbia/preview.asp?pid=3&mid=11&cid=37&id=37; 
accessed: 18.04.2009). 
36 Olsen, P. (2009) 1, page 8. 
37 Aarnisalo, K.; Heiskanen, S.; Jaakkola, K.; Landor, E. and Raaska, L. (2007), page 8. 
38 Moe, T. (1998), page 211. 
39 Karlsen, K.M.; Olsen, P. and Storøy, J. (2006), page 19. 
 
 - 27 Figure 14 shows the integrant components of traceability, and their relations. 
 
 
 
Figure 14.40 External and internal traceability, downstream and upstream. 
 
40 Adapted from 
http://www.sporfori.fo/InEnglish/Ontraceability/InternalExternalTraceability/tabid/109/Default.aspx 
(accessed: 18.04.2009) and GS1 - The GS1 Traceability Standard: What you need to know, at www.gs1.org 
(accessed: 18.04.2009). 
 
 - 28 3.1.3 Drivers 
There are different drivers for traceability in food supply chains, including fish and fish 
products ones. These drivers circumscribe the requirements for the identification and 
information systems.41 Figure 15 shows these drivers and their inter-relations. 
 
 
 
 
Figure 15.42 
Traceability 
drivers in the 
food sector. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Risk avoidance drivers (the left side of the diagrams) and economic development drivers 
(the right side of the diagrams) are considered old, traditional ones, while the 
documentation of sustainability driver is a new one, which emerged in the last few years 
from the growing global concern about natural resources and environment. 
 
3.2 Legislation, standardisation, certification and eco-labelling 
3.2.1 Legislation 
At this moment, at Community level, the EU Regulation 178/2002 General principles and 
requirements of food law is the most relevant piece of legislation in the area of food 
traceability. In the area of fish, fish and fishery products traceability, the EU Regulation 
1005/2008 and the EU Regulation Proposal CNS/2008/0216 are the most important legal 
documents. 
 
41 Bollen, A.F.; Riden, C.P. and Opara, L.U. (2006), page 94. 
42 Olsen, P. (2009) 1, page 8. 
 
 - 29 a. EU Regulation 178/200243 
From 2005 the European Commission set into force a new food law (Common food law), 
and established the European Food Safety Authority. The general principles and 
requirements of this law are specified in EU Regulation 178/2002. As an instrument to deal 
with food crises and a rapid increasingly global trade, this regulation has a strong focus on 
food safety, reduction of food induced health risks, protection of consumers and building 
up confidence in food and food production. The ability to carry out recalls of contaminated 
products is considered as an important functionality in a future food safety regime. This 
requirement is partly built into Regulation 178/2002 by the so called "one-up/forward, onedown/backward approach", where all producers have to document from whom they have 
received food stuffs and to whom they have sent their products.44 
 
In connexion with the same problematic addressed by this Regulation, EU developed other 
legal documents that deal in a more or less specific way with traceability of food in general 
or of fish and fish products in particular. For an overview of the most relevant of them, see 
Appendix 4. 
 
b. EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS)45 
Both EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), try to 
implement within the Community Member States the traceability requirement for the fish 
and fishery products, by introducing different recorded documents along the custody chain. 
It is important to specify that these two legal norms are of regulation type, which requires 
direct implementation in the Member States. 
 
When deciding if the new legislation should take the form of the Code of Conduct or a 
regulatory instrument in the form of a new binding regulation, the European Commission 
adopted the later option.46 This choice was taken in order to consolidate and simplify the 
existing legislation, develop a new, harmonised approach to inspection and control 
(covering all aspects from ?net to plate?), to develop a common culture of compliance and 
to ensure the effective application of Common Fisheries Policy rules. 
 
43 EU Official Journal L31/1 (2002); 
44 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/Traceability:Legislation (accessed: 19.04.2009). 
45 Together with EU Regulation Proposal CNS/2007/0114 concerning authorisations for fishing activities of 
Community fishing vessels outside Community waters and the access of third country vessels to Community 
waters, they form the new pillars of the EU Common Fisheries Policy. 
46 European Commission (2008). 
 
 - 30 Therefore, EU Member States have to transpose into their national legislation both new 
documents as such, one of the outcomes having to be a global and integrated control 
system to deter IUU fishing. 
 
3.2.2 Standardisation 
It is generally accepted that there are three types of standards47: 
- First-party standards ? developed by a company for application within the 
company. They are used by the company, but they are open to important criticism 
concerning conflict of interest. 
- Second-party standards ? developed by an industry organisation for application to 
the entire industry sector. In their case, the common criticisms are conflict of interest and 
playing to lowest common denominator.48 
- Third-party standards ? developed by organisations independent of the industry to 
which the standards apply. They are often seen as the preferred choice in supporting the 
dissemination of environmental information to consumers as they have the appearance of 
independence and objectivity. Nevertheless, the true objectivity of these standards is 
dependent on the range of input provided during the standard development process. 
Therefore, including a wide range of stakeholders could assure the objectiveness and 
independence of the standard. All standards presented hereunder are third-party type. 
 
ISO introduced in the last five years three new standards49 that define the requirements for 
a traceability system within a food safety management system and the data that needs to be 
retained (ISO 22000:2005 Food safety management systems ? requirements; ISO 22519 
traceability system in the agriculture food chain general principles for design and 
development; ISO 22005:2007 Traceability in the feed and food chain - General principles 
and basic requirements for system design and implementation).50 
 
47 Philips, B.; Ward, T.; Chaffee, C. (2003), pages 5-6; 
48 Industry associations are usually in the position of having to protect all members equally, so creating 
standards that allow for significant differentiation among members is often against the charter of the 
association, unless the express wishes of its paying members. 
49 An ISO standard is a documented agreement containing technical specifications or other precise criteria to 
be used consistently as rules, guidelines, or definitions of characteristics to ensure that materials, products, 
processes and services are fit for their purpose. (http://www.iso.org/iso/iso_catalogue/faq_standards_2.htm, 
accessed: 19.04.2009). 
50 Aarnisalo, K.; Heiskanen, S.; Jaakkola, K.; Landor, E. and Raaska, L. (2007), page 13; and 
http://www.iso.org/iso/catalogue_detail?csnumber=36297 (accessed: 19.04.2009). 
 
 - 31 In the fish and fish products traceability area, ISO is developing now a new technical 
standard, ISO TC234 Traceability of fish products ? Specification on the information to be 
recorded in captured fish distribution chains, which is for the moment still in the draft 
stage. 
 
Besides ISO, both the international organisation Codex Alimentarius and the European 
Committee for Standardization (CEN) have also dealt with questions on traceability during 
the last years, establishing the following standards: 
- Alimentarius CAC/GL 60-2006 Principles for Traceability/Product Tracing as a Tool 
within a Food Inspection and Certification System; 
- CEN/CWA 14659:2003 - Traceability of fishery products: Specification of the 
information to be recorded in farmed fish distribution chains; 
- CEN/CWA 14660:2003 - Traceability of fishery products: Specification on the 
information to be recorded in captured fish distribution chains (it constitutes the starting 
point for ISO TC234); 
- CEN/SS C01-Food Products prEN ISO 22005 Traceability in the feed and food chain: 
General principles and basic requirements for system design and implementation 
(ISO/FDIS 22005:2007).51 
 
There are many other traceability standards developed by different institutions, but it is 
important to state that except CEN/CWA 14660:2003 and ISO TC234 standards, all the 
other standards that deal with information needed in captured fish distribution chains do 
not standardize on parameter level.52 Therefore, recorded data is not measurable, stopping 
only at a surface level of quantifiable recording (e.g. parameter level: register transport 
vehicle number; non-parameter level: register only type of transport-truck, vessel, plane, 
train). 
 
3.2.3 Certification 
Certification is the procedure by which a certification body gives written or equivalent 
assurance that a product, process or service conforms to certain standards.53 
 
 
51 Aarnisalo, K.; Heiskanen, S.; Jaakkola, K.; Landor, E. and Raaska, L. (2007), page 13. 
52 Olsen, P. (2009) 2, page 16. 
53 FAO (2009), page 15. 
 
 - 32 As in the case of standards, there are three types of certification: 
- First-party certification ? by which a single company or stakeholder group 
develops its own standards, analyzes its own performance, and reports on its compliance. 
- Second-party certification ? where an industry or trade association or NGO 
develops standards, analyzes the performance of involved parties, and reports on 
compliance. 
- Third party certification ? where an accredited external, independent, certification 
body, which is not involved in standards setting or has any other conflict of interest, 
analyzes the performance of involved parties, and reports on compliance. 
 
3.2.4 Eco-labelling54 
Eco-labelling schemes, which are a marked based private sector mechanism to manage the 
sustainable use of natural resources, can be categorized as follows55: 
- First party labelling schemes: established by individual companies, based on their 
own product standards, with ?self declared? compliance. 
- Second party labelling schemes: established by industry associations for their 
member?s products; compliance is verified through internal audit procedures or by 
employing external companies as auditors (e.g. Bureau Veritas). 
- Third party labelling schemes: developed by a body independent of procedures, 
distributors and sellers of the labelled products. The label is licensed to a producer. The 
?chain of custody? is tracked to ensure that the labelled product it is in fact derived form 
the certified one. Audit is conducted by independent, third-party certifier. 
 
The eco-labelling certification process has two distinct stages: 
 
1. fishery certification (three phases: pre-pre assessment, pre-assessment and full 
assessment); 
 
 
54 One should not mistake eco-labelling for a certification scheme, as eco-labelling schemes use certification 
ones as processes within their own procedure. 
55 FAO (2001) 2, page 11. 
 
 - 33 2. chain of custody certification. This refers to the set of measures which makes sure that a 
certified product originates from a certified production chain and is not mixed with noncertified products. Chain of custody verification measures track/trace the product 
throughout the production, processing, distribution and marketing chain, with 
corresponding documentation56, as showed in Figure 16. 
 
Figure 16.57 Summary of chain of custody from a certified fishery throughout to consumer. 
 
The client who is under assessment can decide to stop the process after the first stage, in 
this case only the fishery being awarded the eco-label certification (e.g. after passing this 
step under MSC standards, the USA Alaska salmon fishery claims that is MSC certified), 
or it can decide to complete the second stage, in which case the products derived from the 
fishery being allowed to carry the eco-label. During the certification process, the burden of 
proof is reversed, which means that the client has to demonstrate the certification body that 
it meets the certification scheme standards. 
 
 
 
 
 
56 FAO (2009), page 15. 
57 Modified from Philips, B.; Ward, T.; Chaffee, C. (2003), page 88. 
 
 - 34 As shown in Appendix 5, there are quite a number of standards, certification schemes and 
labels in fisheries and aquaculture. This situation can be confusing for all parties, and there 
is an obvious need for comparison of practices - the benchmarking58 issue. While in 
aquaculture a benchmarking study was undertaken by WWF in 200759, in capture fisheries 
this comparability study is lacking. There are strong indications that this kind of study is 
more than needed in the industry, as voiced by the stakeholders during the Round Table on 
eco-labelling and certification in fisheries sector, held in The Hague in April 2009. 
 
3.3 Traceability systems 
3.3.1 Types of systems 
Not all traceability systems are equivalent and/or interchangeable, nor can they necessarily 
be consolidated. Different purposes and systems also trigger different expectations in 
producers and consumers that do not always correspond to the traceability system in use 
(regulatory, contractual or voluntary). This partially explains the current uncertainty related 
to traceability requirements and to the possible implications of traceability regulations. 
Table 1A presents the most fish and fish products common traceability systems, as 
identified by FAO/Globefish in 2006.60 
 
Table 1A. Traceability systems: purpose, objective, attributes, standards and examples. 
 
Purpose Objective Attributes Standard Example 
Mandatory EU regulation 
Safety 
Consumer protection 
(through recall and 
withdrawal) 
Specified in food & 
fish safety 
regulations Voluntary (1) USA regulation 
Specified in security 
regulations Regulatory (2) 
USA Prevention of 
Bio-terrorism, 
regulation 
Security 
Prevention of 
criminal actions 
(through verifiable 
identification and 
deterrence) 
Verification of 
selected attributes on 
package and/or food 
Voluntary 
(no common 
standard) 
Brand & product 
protection 
Regulatory 
Quality 
Consumer assurance 
(through recall and 
withdrawal) 
Specific attributes 
included in 
regulations 
Regulatory (3) 
EC labelling, 
mandatory consumer 
information. 
 
58 Benchmarking is the process of comparing the cost, cycle time, productivity, or quality of a specific 
process or method to another that is widely considered to be an industry standard or best practice. 
(www.wikipedia.com, accessed: 27.04.2009). 
59 See Benchmarking Study on International Aquaculture Certification Programmes. World Wildlife Fund 
(WWF), Switzerland and Norway, Zurich and Oslo 2007. 
60 Lupin, H. (2006). 
 
 - 35 Nonregulatory 
quality & 
Marketing 
Creation and 
maintenance of 
credence attributes 
Specific attributes 
included in public 
standards 
Voluntary 
(common 
standard) (4) 
Public Quality seals 
(e.g. Label Rouge, 
France) 
Organic fish, Ecolabelling 
Private standards 
(4) 
Own traceability 
systems (e.g. WalMart) 
Food chain 
trade & 
logistics 
management 
Food chain 
uniformity & 
improved logistics 
Specific attributes 
required to food and 
services suppliers by 
contract 
Public standards 
for encoding 
information 
GS 128 (5) (e.g. with 
TRACEFISH (6) 
standard) SSCC (7) 
Plant 
Management 
Productivity 
improvement and 
costs reduction 
Internal logistics and 
link to specific 
attributes 
Voluntary (internal 
traceability; own 
or public 
standards) 
From simple to 
complex IT systems. 
 
(1) Recall and withdrawal can become compulsory if a responsible company does not take action. 
(2) Includes the possibility of mandatory disposal, recall and withdrawal, legal and police actions but primary purpose is prevention. 
(3) Includes the possibility of mandatory disposal, recall and withdrawal and administrative actions, but primary purpose is consumer 
assurance. 
(4) Could include voluntary (contractual) recall and withdrawal and agreed (contractual) sanctions. 
(5) GS1 System standardizes bar codes (www.GS1.com) 
(6) TRACEFISH, ?Traceability of Fish Products? (EC funded project) http://www.tracefish.org/ 
(7) SSCC : Serial Shipping Container Code (UCC) 
 
In order to adapt Table 1A to the realities of the traceability drivers as defined in Chapter 
3.1.3, it is here purposed that one more row be added: 
 
Table 1 B. Supplement to traceability systems: purpose, objective, attributes, standards and 
examples. 
Purpose Objective Attributes Standard Example 
Mandatory 
EU Regulation 
Proposal 
CNS/2008/0216 
Documentation 
of 
sustainability 
Natural resource 
sustainability 
Specified in 
environment 
protection 
regulations Voluntary FAO IPOA-IUU 
 
3.3.2 Components 
Traceability systems are constructions which enable traceability. There are several 
essential elements of traceability constituting an integrated food supply chain traceability 
system.61 These elements are: 
1. Product traceability - defines the physical location of a product at any stage in the 
supply chain. 
2. Process traceability - ascertains the type of activities that have affected the product 
during the growing and post harvest operations (what, where and when). 
 
61 Opara, L.U. (2003), pages 102-103. 
 
 - 36 3. Genetic traceability - determines the genetic composition of the product and includes 
information on the type and origin (source, supplier). 
4. Inputs traceability - determines type and origin (source, supplier) of inputs, e.g. 
fertilizers, additives used for preservation or transformation of the raw materials into 
processed products. 
5. Disease and pest traceability - traces the epidemiology of microbiological hazards and 
pests, which may contaminate food products. 
6. Measurement traceability - relates individual measurement results through calibrations 
to reference standards and assures the quality of measurements by observing various 
factors which may have impact on results (such as environmental factors, operator etc.). 
 
3.3.3 Characteristics 
A good identification system for a product must fulfil the legal requirements, must be 
unique, legible, resistant to damage, easy to capture for records, tamper-proof (resistant to 
interference), able to avoid fraud and incapable of reuse.62 Effective traceability is the 
result of structured data acquisition and clarity of reporting. The acquired data should be 
easily accessible and scrutinable, quickly searchable, and descriptions of production flows 
should be understandable. 
 
Products and activities are core entities of a traceability system, and they are defined by a 
set of essential descriptors that must be included in order to secure the system (Figure 17). 
 
 
 
Figure 17.63 Fundamental 
structure of a traceability 
system. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
62 Aarnisalo, K.; Heiskanen, S.; Jaakkola, K.; Landor, E. and Raaska, L. (2007), page 15. 
63 Moe, T. (1998), page 212. 
 
 - 37  
Traceability can be achieved using either paper based records, a bar/scanner system 
combined with a computerised central database, or an integrated IT traceability system that 
implies among other radio frequency identification (RFID) tags. 
 
3.3.4 Traceable units 
The concept of traceable units is a key aspect in traceability. A traceable unit must be 
uniquely identifiable and linked to the relevant records: it can be one fish (e.g. one big 
halibut), one catch, one day?s catch or one week?s catch. It has been the prerogative of the 
industry to define the appropriate unit64. Trade units, logistic units and batches are 
traceable units, defined as in Table 2. 
 
Table 265. Traceable units: trade unit, logistic unit, batch. 
- Trade Unit (TU) - any item upon which there is a need 
to retrieve predefined information and that may be 
priced, or ordered, or invoiced at any point in any supply 
chain. In practice it often refers to the smallest traceable 
unit that is exchanged between two parties in the supply 
chain. A crate of fish is often a TU. 
(image from 
http://www.fotobank.ru/img/SF15-4519.jpg?size=l) 
 
- Logistic Unit (LU) - an item of any composition 
established for transport and/or storage that needs to be 
managed through the supply chain. In practice it is made 
up by one or more separate TUs. In some cases, the trade 
unit and the logistic unit are the same. A LU is often a 
pallet of fish being distributed from one producer to a 
receiver. 
(image from 
www.promensfoodpackaging.com/page.asp?pageid=402) 
 
 
 
 
 
64 Frederiksen, M. (2006), 
65 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/GTP:Defining_traceable_units (accessed 01.05.2009). 
 
 - 38 - A production batch - has to be referred to 
when dealing with internal traceability. A 
production batch is the traceable unit that raw 
materials and ingredients go into before they 
are transformed into products placed in new 
TUs and LUs. 
Example batch code: 
- Supplier code/Reception date code/Species 
code 
- A/050208/Hd 
- Haddock supplied by company A on 
05.02.2008. 
 
As depicted in Figure 18, batches relate to internal traceability, while TUs/LUs relate to 
external traceability. This distinction is important because globally unique identifiers have 
to be given to traceable units involved in external traceability (since a production batch is 
an internal matter, it does not need to have a globally unique identifier). 
 
 
Figure 18.66 Relation between internal batch and external trade unit. 
 
3.3.5 Data recording of unique ID-codes starting from lowest unit 
To be able to trace both backwards to find origin and forward to find all related units it is 
vital to record all transformations the lowest TU is subject to. The four steps below specify 
how to keep track of transformations.67 
 
 
 
66 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/GTP:Defining_traceable_units (accessed 01.05.2009). 
67 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/GTP:Transformations (accessed: 01.05-2009) 
 
 - 39 1. Define the TU in the business under examination (e.g. a 20 kg crate with herring). 
2. Record IDs of received TUs (raw materials and/or ingredients). Here are two 
alternatives: a) if the received TU has a unique ID, record it; b) if the received TU does not 
have a unique ID, allocate one to it. For an allocation system of unique identification of 
traceable units see Appendix 6. (e.g. the 20 kg crate with herring was received with the 
unique ID-code or was given the unique ID-code 
 (01)07038010000065(8008)040915125603). 
3. Record the ID of the TUs that go into the production, and give all produced TUs a 
unique ID. In practice, the ID of TUs that goes into production will at that stage be linked 
to a production batch (cf. Batch number). Every produced TU must be allocated a unique 
number. In this way the ID of received TUs will be linked with the ID of produced TUs. 
This practice ensures forward traceability inside the business. Where possible and relevant, 
it is also recommended to record the fraction (%) and/or the net weight of each TU that 
goes into production. (e.g. the 1 kg net fish weight barrels with marinated herring produced 
from the received crate of 20 kg of herring will be given an ID-code similar to and related 
with the crate?s ID-code) 
4. Record the ID of all TUs dispatched. Fulfilment of requirements in step 2-4 provides 
both a link between received and dispatched TUs (and the other way around), via the 
production process (internal traceability), and a link to previous and next food business 
operator (external traceability). 
 
Figure 19 shows how relations are linked both ways through a business. For example, 
entire TU 11 is input factor in TU 21, while TU 21 is also made up by TU 12. Both 
fractions (%) and net weight are indicated. In this figure the production step is removed 
and only relation between received and dispatched TUs is shown. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 40  
Figure 19.68 Trade units flow. 
 
3.3.6 The importance of weighing 
Weight accountability is a very important aspect in a fish traceability system, as it prevents 
the infiltration of fish from untraceable provenance, usually from IUU activities. In 
Figure19, the fish net weight received is equivalent with the fish net weight delivered, and 
this was recorded in a data sheet. For example, a tuna canning factory receives 5.000 kg of 
uniquely identified tuna fish crates, but delivers cans that contain 7.000 kg of net weight of 
tuna fish. The question that rises is where do the additional 2.000 kg of tuna fish come 
from? If no recorded evidence can be found according to applicable legal provisions in 
order to identify the provenance of the 2.000 kg extra of tuna (no unique ID-codes, no 
catch certificates etc.), then it is clear that the fish has an illegitimate origin. 
 
 
 
 
 
68 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/GTP:Transformations (accessed: 01.05-2009). 
 
 - 41 3.3.7 Transformations/operations 
As referred above, at each point of the supply chain, the traceable units go through 
different types of operations/transformations. In order to achieve a good traceability of the 
product, the information that is linked to that product must undergo a parallel operation, so 
the product and the information will remain linked. There are 6 main types of 
operations/transformations connected to traceable units and their linked data. Some of 
them are more or less exposed and susceptible to infiltration of IUU fishery products, or 
can facilitate for it, as exemplified in Table 3. For structuring Table 3, available 
information from other authors69 was reviewed, amended and organised from the new 
perspective. For examples of the other transformations/operations see Appendix 7. 
 
Table 3. Operations/transformations and their exposure to infiltration with IUU fishery products. 
 
1. Transfer (no joining or splitting of the 
unit). It is essential that product ID-code is 
transferred with the product during operation. 
Example: A truck transports 10 pallets with IDcodes of fresh mackerel from the harbour to the 
processing unit. The pallets are not changed 
under transport. 
IUU fish infiltration: The first buyer after an 
IUU vessel lands its catch gives his own IDcodes to the fish which will be sold further on 
as such, without any processing, further on. If at 
the upper links of the supply chain the product 
seems perfectly traceable, a deeper 
investigation to the origin of product will reveal 
the illegality. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
69 Karlsen, K.M.; Olsen, P. and Storøy, J. (2006), pages 11-12, & Derrick, S.; Dillon, M. (2004), pages13-14. 
 
 
 - 42 2. Joining (mixing). During this operation, one 
process step combines several traceable units, 
which should have each an unique ID-code. A new 
ID-code should be established for the new 
combined TU, and the records should clearly 
indicate the ID-codes of all the component TUs. 
Example: One processor, who receives fish from 
more than one fishing vessels, mixes the cod from 
the different vessels (one motive might be that the 
processor does not have sufficient raw material 
from only one source). The fish received from each 
vessel should have its own ID-code, also the mixed 
one, while the records of the processor should 
indicate the ID-codes of all the fish that formed the 
new product with a new ID-code. 
IUU fish infiltration: Only the fish received from 
one vessel has ID-codes, while the one from the 
other boats is derived from IUU activities, and does 
not have ID-codes. The processor mixes the fish 
from all the vessels and gives the new product (the 
mixed fish) a new ID-code that relates only to the 
one form the legitimate fishing vessel. In this case, 
checking the weight of the received fish and the 
delivered one would indicate irregularities, and a 
further investigation will discover the IUU fish. 
 
3. Splitting. During this transformation, one 
traceable unit is split for use in different processes 
or products. New ID-codes should be given to each 
of the split units, while the records should indicate 
the ID-code of the origin product. 
Example: One supplier of cod transports the whole 
day?s catch with the fishing vessel to the 
slaughterhouse where the fish is pumped in 3 
different basins. 
Facilitating for IUU fish infiltration: The supplier 
of cod gives non-unique ID-code to its catch before 
this is pumped into 3 out of 4 basins, and the raw 
 
 
 - 43 material from the basins is given again non-unique 
ID-codes. The IUU fish pumped by an IUU vessel 
in the 4th basin receives the same non-unique IDcode as the legitimate fish from basin 3. During the 
inspection at the landing site, the fish from basin 4 
is assumed to be legitimate while having the same 
ID-code as the one in basin 3. 
 
Note that not giving unique ID-codes to any of the trade units in any kind of 
operation/transformation can immediately and permanently compromise the traceability 
system, as the units can not be either tracked or traced correctly along the custody chain. 
 
3.3.8 Critical traceability control points 
If the infiltration of IUU fish in the supply chain is seen as a hazard which can be 
prevented by means of traceability, then all the points along the custody chain where the 
possibility of appearance of the hazard is high can be defined as critical traceability control 
points. The fish and fish products can enter a legitimate fish supply chain through three 
different points: at sea, at landing and at onshore distribution chain, as suggested in Figure 
20. This distinction is important as different critical traceability control points can be 
identified at each IUU fish entrance point. 
 
Figure 20. IUU fish entering points into the legitimate fish supply chain. 
 
 - 44 The critical traceability control point (CTCP) can be defined as a step at which the control 
of traceability can be applied and it is essential to prevent, eliminate or reduce the entrance 
of IUU fish in the legitimate fish supply chain. 
 
 In order to identify the CTCP, this study proposes the following steps suggested in Figure 
21. These steps were designed following the decision tree modelling method.70 In this 
context, step is defined as an operation (e.g. harvesting, landing) or transformation (e.g. 
splitting, joining, grouping) in the fish supply chain, from primary production to final 
consumption, the point in the chain where exists the possibility for mixing of non-IUU fish 
and IUU fish. Each of the points identified will need traceability controls to ensure that 
mixing does not occur. Among the CTCP identified after this method there are, for 
example: 1. at sea: 
fishing, harvesting or 
transhipment 
operations; 2. at 
landing: pumping 
fish from the fishing 
vessel into basins; 3. 
at onshore 
distribution chain: 
packing crates with 
fish brought by 
different fishing 
vessels or even fish 
from the same vessel 
but from a different 
catch. 
 
Figure 21. Decision 
tree to identify critical 
traceability points in 
the fish supply chain. 
 
70 Miles, M.B.; Huberman, A.M. (1994), page 185. 
 
 - 45 The identification of CTCP along the fish supply chain is important as it indicates the 
weakest links of the custody chain; the points where the entrance of IUU fish in the 
legitimate trade could be stopped or reduced by means of traceability. 
 
 
3.4 Analytical methods used in fish traceability investigations 
Traceability documentation is the paper trail that must accompany a product and contain 
all pertinent data to trace its origin and life-history. It includes species, ingredients, origins, 
manufacturing processes, temperature logs, etc.71 Full traceability will help to follow up 
honestly produced and handled products, but because they are honestly produced and 
treated it is not to be expected that they will also be correctly labelled. For example, more 
than one-third of all the fish from the US market is mislabelled, for different reasons: 
hiding IUU fish, selling under-utilised fish with a bad image at a higher price, profiting on 
account of legitimate eco-labelled products72. Sometimes the products appear to be 
perfectly traceable, but they are in fact fraudulent, in which case fisheries forensics has to 
be applied. 
 
In traceability investigations, the target could be finding the geographical origin of the 
food/food product (geographical traceability) or to correctly identify the individual animal, 
breed or species (genetic traceability). Analyses performed on a sample to assess whether 
the product is indeed what the label says are called authentication analyses. The methods 
used in these analyses can be categorized into: physicochemical techniques (using the 
variation of the radioactive isotope content of the product, spectroscopy, pyrolysis or 
electronic nose), biological techniques (using the analysis of total bacterial flora through 
many techniques such as Denaturing Gradient Gel Electrophoresis (DGGE) or DNA 
chips), biochemical techniques (such as API galleries, analysis of antibiotic resistance and 
ELISA tests) and molecular biological techniques (such as DGGE or Single Strand 
Conformation of Polymorphism (SSCP)).73 All these methods need the construction of 
databases with authentic material so that unknown samples can be analysed under the same 
conditions as the reference material. The results are then statistically analysed to see 
whether the unknown matches the authentic sample, or samples suitable as substitutes, or 
 
71 Martinez, I., James, D., Loréal, H. (2005), page 28. 
72 Jacquet, J. L.; Pauly, D. (2008). 
73 Aarnisalo, K.; Heiskanen, S.; Jaakkola, K.; Landor, E. and Raaska, L. (2007), page 34. 
 
 - 46 whether it does not match any of the material included in the database (if a new species is 
used). In order to reduce the likelihood of not identifying the samples it is useful to have as 
large a database of known reference material as possible.74 
 
Genetic traceability is based on the identification of both animals and their products 
through the study of DNA, using the four most important features of the DNA molecule: 
enormous variability among individuals; inalterability during animal life; stability to the 
different treatments of processed food; it is present in every cell of the organism. 
 
Once the DNA is extracted from the chosen matrix (it can either be fish tissue, blood, 
muscle, skin, or even a processed food such as fish fingers or canned tuna) it is analyzed 
by molecular markers to obtain a fingerprint or specific allelic frequencies allowing for 
individual, breed or species identification. Since the introduction of the polymerase chain 
reaction (PCR) in 1989, many different markers have been discovered and studied. At 
present the most widely used are microsatellites also known as short tandem repeats (STR), 
and single nucleotide polymorphism (SNP). The use of these technologies in fish and their 
products is just an extension of techniques already in use for human testing and routinely 
applied in forensic casework.75 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
74 Martinez, I., James, D., Loréal, H. (2005), page 37. 
75 Dalvit, C.; De Marchi, M. and Cassandro, M. (2007), page 445. 
 
 - 47  
4. TRACEABILITY AND IUU FISHING DETERRENCE, ANALYSIS OF LINKS 
 
4.1 Introduction 
In order to analyse if the traceability related provisions of EU Regulation 1005/2008 and 
EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) are both relevant for IUU fishing deterrence and 
fulfilling the chain of custody traceability requirements, two models were designed. Model 
1 was conceived to identify the overlapping of the necessary data for identifying IUU 
components (actors or products) with the traceability data recorded in the documentation 
imposed by the legal documents at each critical traceability control point. Model 2 was 
designed to identify the fulfilment of the chain of custody requirements along the 
traceability control points. Using the earlier train metaphor, the first model analysed if the 
data stored in the carriages are sufficient/adequate for stopping IUU fish to enter the EU 
market, while the second model analysed if the train track is properly designed to carry the 
carriages. In both examples, the train was attaching new carriages only in the critical 
traceability control points. 
 
As related issues, eco-labelling and genetic traceability aspects were included after the 
discussion of the models? results. 
 
4.2 Method: description, materials, premises, limitations, suggestions 
4.2.1 General methodology and materials 
Due to the complex nature of this research, a mixed methods data analysis was used in 
order to comprise the qualitative data in a quantitative manner.76 The study followed the 
usual steps of mixed data analysis (data reduction, data display and data transformation), 
where the second step involved the most troublesome decision of choosing a proper 
graphical display for the designed model. 
 
The models passed through subsequent stages of partially ordered cross-case matrices and 
case-ordered descriptive matrices until they had reached the final form of case-ordered 
predictor-outcome N-way matrices. Predictor-outcome matrices align cases on a main 
outcome or criterion variable, and provide data for each case on the main predictor 
 
76 Onwuegbuzie, A.J.; Dickinson, W.B. (2008), page 205. 
 
 - 48 variables thought to be the most important contributors to the outcome.77 This kind of 
matrices is deemed useful when the analysis has some sort of inferential and explanatory 
aim, rather than just visualization and recognition of patterns. The purpose of this study was 
not only to barely present the available data comprised in the trade documents, and to find a 
pattern between document cases, but to predict if the information will fit a certain purpose. 
The N-way matrices were, thus, chosen due to their power to handle the complexity of the 
clustered predictors and cases included. 
 
The legal material used was the text of EU Regulation 1005/2008), as found in the Official 
Journal of the European Union, and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) as found in 
the Procedure file78 (the original text was corroborated with the Parliament legislative 
resolution). 
 
4.2.2 Model 1: Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by means of traceability 
a. Description and materials 
The N-way model designed for the identification of overlap of IUU components (actors or 
products) and traceability data, as recorded in the documentation imposed by the 
Regulations at each critical traceability control point, is based on the following series of 
steps. In order to improve readability some simple examples are given. 
 
1. Identification of the IUU fish entrance points in the legitimate fish supply chain, of the 
associated critical traceability control points and of their linked legally assigned 
documents. The last item (legally assigned documents) will be displayed in the results 
matrix, in columns clustered according to the IUU fish entrance point. The requirements of 
these documents form the first set of data that is assessed against the one defined at step 2 
of the method (IUU operations identifiers). 
Example: At the IUU fish entrance point ?at sea?, one of the critical traceability 
control points is ?the operation of transhipment?, while the operation linked 
document assigned by EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) is ?the 
transhipment declaration?. The term ?transhipment declaration? will be displayed in 
the results matrix, and its data requirements will be assessed in connection with the 
IUU fishing identifiers. 
 
77 Mile, M.B.; Huberman, A.M. (1994), page 213. 
78 http://www.europarl.europa.eu/oeil/file.jsp?id=5715242 (accessed: 12.05.2009). 
 
 - 49 As the display form of the model is a case-ordered predictor-outcome N-way matrix, the 
following steps (2 to 7) define the predictors, which are displayed in rows, clustered 
according to their prediction value: IUU fishing deterrence data, traceability, law 
jurisdiction and miscellaneous. 
 
2. Designation of the identifiers of the different necessary information for finding IUU 
operations components. These identifiers are circumscribed by descriptors (the generic 
class) and parameters (the specific class). These identifiers are derived from fisheries 
management measures79 , and the definitions of IUU fishing80 and IUU fishing vessel81. 
Example A. Identify the management measure: area X is closed for fishing all year 
round. Identify the illegal fishing activity: fishing at any time in area X. The 
identifier is, thus, a combination of a descriptor (right or wrong place) and a 
parameter (area of catch). During the control of any of the documents required in 
the chain of custody it can be scrutinized whether or not the area of catch is right, 
and whether or not the catch is from area X. 
Example B. Identify the management measure: IUU fishing vessel owners should be 
excluded from trade. An appropriate descriptor for such identifier could be: bad will 
vessel owner. Specific parameters for such identifier could be: name of the vessel 
owner + address of the vessel owner. When a certain vessel is identified as engaged 
in IUU operations, by finding the name of its owner the competent authority of the 
Member State/third-country involved can exercise its control over nationals engaged 
in IUU fishing. 
3. Inclusion of the unique identification and weighing traceability requirements, as 
definitive components of a properly designed traceability system for fishery products. Each 
legal document is scrutinized for occurrence of general or specific requirement of assigning 
unique ID-codes to fish trade units. Further, each legal document is scrutinized for 
adequate inclusion of information on whether the fish has to be weighed on scales approved 
by competent authorities before entering distribution chain onshore. 
 
 
 
79 FAO (2003) and FAO (1997). 
80 FAO (2001). 
81 EU Regulation 1005/2008, Article 3. 
 
 - 50 4. Inclusion of the validation of documents parameter. The validation of documents by a 
competent authority was assimilated by this study to a second-party certification, as defined 
in Chapter 3.2.3 of this paper. This type of validation grants credibility to the data included 
in the document. 
5. Inclusion of the exemption parameter. Sometimes, granting exemptions from legal 
requirements leads to non-unitary application of the law. If the law is not applicable to all 
kinds of fishing vessels, catch, operators and others, it may create a loophole that can be 
exploited by IUU operators. The exact identification of the exemption, of the loophole, and 
of how this can be abused by IUU operators falls outside the scope of this study. 
Example: If the requirement for filling in a transport document has an exemption in 
a certain case, IUU operators may concentrate their transport activities to comply 
with this exemption. 
6. Inclusion of the cross-reference documents parameter. The study will search if the 
legislation requires that each document issued at any link of the custody chain has to 
contain a reference to the next document up or down the chain. This requirement it is not 
essential for traceability, but it can facilitate it. 
Example: If the sales note specifies the number of the catch certificate, it will be 
easier to trace the product. 
7. Inclusion of the type of fishing vessel: community vessel (as defined in EU Regulation 
1005/2008 Article 2(6): flying the flag of a Member State and registered in the 
Community); vessels flying the flag of a member state other than Community fishing 
vessels; third country vessels. This parameter is relevant in order to assess if the legislation 
applies in a unitary way to all fishing vessels engaged in trade with the Community, and to 
determine the jurisdiction of the norm. 
8. Analysis of the link between N- predictors (the IUU operations information identifiers, 
traceability requirements restricted for the purpose of this model to unique identifiers and 
weighing, jurisdiction of the law and miscellaneous) and the requirements for product data 
imposed for each document by the Regulations. The rating system simple states: ?NA? = 
not applicable; ?x?=existent; ?\?=non-existent. 
Examples: If during the analysis it is found that the requirement to state the name of 
the buyer in the sales note exists in EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), then 
the parameter ?operator up? will be rated as ?x? (existent) in the box where the 
?sales note? column intersects the ?operator up? row. If it is found that the 
requirement to give unique identification to trade units does not exist in the catch 
 
 - 51 certificate, the parameter ?unique identification? will be rated as ?\? (non-existent) 
in the box where the ?catch certificate? column intersects the ?unique identification? 
row. As the existence of VMS on board of a shipping vessel is not related to the 
cross-reference parameter, the later will be rated ?NA? in the box where the 
?advance identification technology? column intersects the ?cross-reference to other 
documents? row. 
 
The model described above was run two times, once for the EU Regulation 1005/2008 and 
once for the EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), and the relevant Article number is 
displayed in a N-way matrix. 
 
b. Premises 
When running the model and interpreting the results, some premises related to the 
interpretation of the legal text should be borne in mind: 
- in the case of EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), as indicated by Article 48(4) 
Principles of monitoring of marketing, the provisions of Article 50 Traceability were 
corroborated with the ones of Articles 14 Logbooks, 19 Transhipment declaration, 21 
Landing declaration, 54 Sales notes, 57 Take-over declarations, and 58 Transport 
document. Therefore, the traceability requirements listed in Article 50 were included in the 
data requirements for each document. 
- the specific, but not the general, requirements of both Regulations were taken into 
consideration, as the two legal texts are of regulatory type, rather than guidelines of 
conduct, meant to be fully implemented among the Member States. 
Example: In order to assess if a comprehensive traceability system was introduced 
by the EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), the general requirement of 
Article 48(2) that reads ?All lots of fishery and aquaculture products shall be 
traceable and the operators shall be able to identify the origin and destination of lots 
from catching or harvesting to final consumer? was not taken at face value. Instead, 
the specific requirements for traceability systems disseminated along the entire 
document were assessed for consistency. 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 52 4.2.3 Model 2: Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability 
The model designed to define the fulfilment of the chain of custody requirements along the 
traceability control points is based on the following steps, which bear resemblances to the 
methodology used in Model 1. 
 
As the display form of the model is a case-ordered predictor-outcome N-way matrix, step 1 
defines the predictors. These are displayed in rows, clustered according to their prediction 
value: control/management system in place, confirmation of inputs, secure product 
labelling etc. 
 
1. Identification of the chain of custody requirements. These requirements are 
circumscribed by descriptors (the generic class) and parameters (the specific class). They 
were derived from chain of custody documentation used in practice82. 
2. Identification of the general critical traceability control points for each of the legal 
document: at sea, at landing, and along the onshore distribution chain. Procedures are 
identical for the two legal texts analyzed. 
3. Analysis of the link between the chain of custody requirements and the correspondent 
legal provision assurance at each general critical traceability control point. The rating 
system utilized to classify the entries was: ?NA? = not applicable; ?x?=existent; and 
?\?=non-existent. If at least for one of the links of the custody chain, clustered in 
accordance to critical traceability control points, the parameter requirement was deemed 
fulfilled, the requirement was considered as ?existent? for the entire cluster. 
Example: If it was found that the requirement of a label is fulfilled at the 
transhipment link, the parameter ?presence of label? was rated ?x? (existent) in the 
box where the ?1. at sea/ EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS)? column 
intersects the ?presence of label? row, even though the label might not be required 
to be present at other links from the same group (catching, harvesting). 
 
The model was run simultaneously for both EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation 
Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS). 
 
 
 
82 www.us.sgs.com/rd12.pdf (accessed: 05.05.2009); www.msc.org (accessed: 05.05.2009); Olsen, P. (2009) 2. 
 
 - 53 4.3 Results 
4.3.1 Output 
The output matrices obtained for Model 1: Acquiring IUU fishing identification data by 
means of traceability are displayed in Tables 4 and 5. The output matrix for Model 2: 
Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability is given in Table 6. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 54  
Table 4. Output of Model 1: Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by means of traceability. Analysis of EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS). 
IUU operations identifiers EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) 
Descriptor Parameter 1. at sea 1. at sea 1. at sea 2. at landing 2. at landing 2. at landing 2. at landing 
ID technology Logbook Transhipment Landing Sales Take-over Transport 
1. Type of fishing declaration declaration note declaration document 
activity Art. 9,10,11 Art. 14, 50 Art. 19, 50 Art. 21, 50 Art. 54, 50 Art. 57, 50 Art. 58, 50 
A. Illegal 1. genuine species/ 1.1 species composition by common name NA x x x x x x 
(1 to 16) population identification 1.2 species composition by scietific name NA x x x x x x 
B. Unreported 1.3 product code NA \ \ \ x x x 
(9, 10, 11, 12) 2. catch on/off season 2.1 date of catch NA x x x x x x 
C. Unregulated 3. time effort limit 3.1 times of harvesting NA x x \ x x x 
(10, 12, 13, 16) 4. right or wrong place 4.1. area of catch NA x x x x x x 
5. licenced or not 5.1 licence number NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
5. 2 valid to NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
6. appropiate gear 6.1 gear type NA x x x x x x 
6.2 by-catch avoidance/reduction devices NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
6.3 technical specifications NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
7. catch limit 7.1 weight of catch per each species NA x x x x x x 
8. catch size 8.1 minimum fish size NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
9. discards 9.1 volume of discards NA x NA NA NA NA NA 
10. bad will vessel owner 10.1 registered vessel owner name NA \ \ \ x x X 
10.2 registered vessel owner address NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
11. IUU vessel or not 11.1 vessel name NA x x x x x x 
11.2 vessel flag NA x \ \ \ \ \ 
11.3. vessel call sign NA x \ \ \ \ \ 
11.4 vessel EU/IMO/Loyd's number NA x \ \ x x x 
11.5 types of processing authorised on board NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
12. advance technological 12.1 VMS x NA NA NA NA NA NA 
identification 12.2 AIS x NA NA NA NA NA NA 
12.3 VDS x NA NA NA NA NA NA 
13. IUU port 13.1 port name NA NA x \ x x \ 
13.2 destination port NA NA x NA NA NA NA 
13.3 date of landing NA NA NA NA x x \ 
14. bad will operators 14. 1 name of operator up NA NA x \ x x x 
14.2 name of operator down NA NA x x x \ \ 
15. operation date 15.1 operation date NA \ \ \ x x x 
16.conformity with 16.1 references of applicable NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
management measures conservation and management measures 
3. Weighing of product at all stages NA x x x x x x 
2. Unique identification 1.1 unique lot number NA \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4. Validation NA C C C C C C 
5. Exemptions x x x x x x x 
6. Cross-reference to other documents NA \ \ \ x x \ 
7. Vessels 1. community fishing vessels x x x x x x x 
 2. vessels flying the flag of a member state other than community fishing vessels \ \ \ \ \ \ \ 
3. third country fishing vessels x x \ \ \ \ \ 
# VMS=Vessel Monitorin System; AIS= Automatic Identification System; VDS=Vessel Detection System. 
# NA = not applicable; X = existent; \ = not existent; C = computerised 
 
 - 55  
 Table 5. Output of Model 1: Acquiring IUU fishing identification data by means of traceability. Analysis of EU Regulation 1005/2008. 
IUU operations identifiers EU Regulation 1005/2008 
Descriptor Parameter 1. at sea 1. at sea 1. at sea 2 . at landing 2 . at landing 2 . at landing 3. onshore distribution chain 
ID technology Logbook Transhipment Catch Re-export Transport Processing plant 
1. Type of fishing transport doc. certificate certificate document certificate 
activity \ \* Art. 14, 19 (4) Art. 14 Art. 21 Art. 14 (1) Art. 14 (2) 
A. Illegal 1. genuine species/ 1.1 species composition by common name NA \* \ ? ? \ \ 
(1 to 17) population identification 1.2 species composition by scietific name NA \* \ ? ? \ \ 
B. Unreported 1.3 product code NA \* x x x \ \ 
(9, 10, 11, 12) 2. catch on/off season 2.1 date of catch NA \* \ x \ \ \ 
C. Unregulated 3. time effort limit 3.1 times of harvesting NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
(10, 12, 13, 16) 4. right or wrong place 4.1. area of catch NA \* \ x \ \ \ 
5. licenced or not 5.1 licence number NA \* \ x \ \ \ 
5.2 valid to NA \* \ x \ \ \ 
6. appropiate gear 6.1 gear type NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
6.2 by-catch avoidance/reduction devices NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
6.3 technical specifications NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
7. catch limit 7.1 weight of catch per each species NA \* x x x \ x (total catch, 
ca tch pro ces s ed 
pro ces s ed fis hery pro duct) 
8. catch size 8.1 minimum fish size NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
9. discards 9.1 volume of discards NA \* \ \ NA NA NA 
10. bad will vessel owner 10.1 registered vessel owner name NA \* x \ \ \ \ 
10.2 registered vessel owner address NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
11. IUU vessel or not 11.1 vessel name NA \* x x \ \ x 
11.2 vessel flag NA \* \ x \ \ x 
11.3. vessel call sign NA \* x x \ \ \ 
11.4 vessel EU/IMO/Loyd's number NA \* x x \ \ \ 
11.5 transport vessel name NA \* x x \ x NA 
11.6 types of processing authorised on board NA \* \ x \ \ \ 
12. advance technological 12.1 VMS \ \* NA NA NA NA NA 
identification 12.2 AIS \ \* NA NA NA NA NA 
12.3 VDS \ \* NA NA NA NA NA 
13. IUU port 13.1 port name NA \* x \ NA \ \ 
13.2 destination port NA \* x x NA \ NA 
13.3 date of landing/transhipment NA \* x \ NA \ NA 
13.4 transhipment port name NA \* x x NA \ NA 
14. bad will operators 14. 1 name of operator up NA \* x x \ \ x 
14.2 name of operator down NA \* x x x x x 
15. operation date 15.1 operation date NA \* \ x x \ x 
16.conformity with 16.1 references of applicable NA \* \ x \ NA NA 
management measures conservation and management measures 
17. nature of fishery product ? NA \* x \ \ \ \ 
3. Weighing of product at all stages NA \* \ x \ \ \ 
2. Unique identification 1.1 unique lot number NA \* \ \ \ \ \ 
4. Validation NA \* \ x x \ x 
5. Exemptions NA \* \ x x \ \ 
6. Cross-reference to other documents NA \* \ x x \ x 
7. Vessels 1. community fishing vessels x \* x x x x x 
 2. vessels flying the flag of a member state other than community fishing vessels \ \ \ \ \ \ \ 
3. third country fishing vessels x \* x x x x x 
# VMS=Vessel Monitorin System; AIS= Automatic Identification System; VDS=Vessel Detection System. 
# NA = not applicable; X = existent; \ = not existent; \* = not existent here but the requirment is dealt with in EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS). 
 
 - 56  
Table 6. Output of Model 2: Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability. Analysis of EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) . 
Chain of Custody Requirements Critical Traceability Control Points 
(Descriptor & Parameter) 1 at sea 2 at landing 3. onshore distribution chain 
( x & x.1 ) EU P EU R EU P EU R EU P EU R 
1. Control/management 1.1 Description of formal document control systems \ \ \ \ \ \ 
system in place 1.2 Physical evidence of document control system x x x x x x 
1.3 Designation of responsible authority x x x x x x 
1.4 Training support to control \ \ \ \ \ \ 
2. Confirmation of inputs 2.1 Evidence of weighed uniquely identified inputs \ \ \ \ \ \ 
2.2 Evidence of accompanying documents x x x x x x 
3. Separation and/or 3.1 Methods for identifying uniquely identified material throughout \ \ 
demarcation of the production/storage chain, especially in the presence of \ \ \ \ 
uniquely identified inputs non-uniquely identified material 
and non-uniquely 3.2 Physical and/or temporal separation of uniquely identified \ \ \ \ \ \ 
identified ones and non-uniquely identified production runs 
3.3 Ability to record and recall the input/output weights of \ \ \ \ \ \ 
different batch runs of uniquely identified material 
4. Secure product 4.1 Presence of a label x \ x \ x \ 
labelling 4.2 Security of label production \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.3 Uniqueness of the label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.4 Adhesion of the label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.5 Legibility of the label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.6 Resistance to damage of the label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.7 Facility to capture for record of the label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.8 Tamper-proof label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.9 Label incapable of reuse \ \ \ \ \ \ 
4.10 Incorporation of actor information on label \ \ \ \ \ \ 
5 Unique identification 5.1 Unique identification of weighed outputs through labels \ \ \ \ \ \ 
of outputs (see parameters 4.1-4.10) 
5.2 Passing forward documents able to link to uniquely \ \ \ \ \ \ 
identified products and batches 
5.3 Passing forward documents have to include at least: 
5.3.1 description of product x x x x x x 
5.3.2 record of volume/quantity x x x x x x 
5.3.3 unique identifier \ \ \ \ \ \ 
5.3.4 expiry date (adapted to each critical control point) x x x x x x 
6. Record keeping 6.1 System for recalling entire 'chain of custody' information \ \ \ \ \ \ 
(species, operation data, volumes etc.) from product outputs 
(batch numbers or other production identifiers) back to 
uniquely identified inputs 
6.2 System records kept for a minimum of X years. x x x x x x 
# NA = not applicable; X = existent; \ = not existent; EU P = EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS); EU R = EU Regulation 1005/2008. 
 
 - 57 4.3.2 Criteria for assessment of Model 1: Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by 
means of traceability results 
The ratings displayed in Table 4 and 5 can be grouped into five different themes, depending 
on the questions that are addressed in the analyses. This is further highlighted in the Tables 
by the utilization of different shade codes for the different themes. 
 
1. The IUU operations identification data ? do they cover or not all the critical control 
points? (Or, re-visiting the metaphor: does the train stop or not at each station to attach 
carriages?) 
2. The IUU operations identification data ? do they exist or not? (The data relevant for IUU 
operations identification: are they stored in the carriages or not). These are the ratings in the 
white cells. 
3. The IUU operations identification data ? are they traceable or not? These are the ratings 
in the light grey cells; 
4. Miscellaneous data related to traceability ? do they exist or not? These are the ratings in 
the medium grey cells. 
5. The IUU operations identification data ? are they retrieved for all the fishing vessels or 
not (covering jurisdiction of the norm)? These are the ratings in the dark grey/white font 
cells. 
 
Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by means of traceability. Analysis of EU 
Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS). Model 1: Table 4. 
 
1. The IUU operations identification data ? do they cover all the critical control points or 
not? The legal text covers all the critical traceability control points at sea and at landing, 
but it covers none of the items at the onshore distribution chain. This exposes the onshore 
segment to possible infiltration of IUU fish. 
 
2. The IUU operations identification data ? do they exist or not? Data are recorded with 
respect to catch identification (species, time, area, weight of the catch), and are, thus, 
relevant for the identification of the IUU fish (wrong species, time, area). However, there 
are no recorded data that might help assessing if the minimum fish size requirements were 
violated. This could be inferred (but still not totally proved) if technical specifications of 
the gear (e.g. hook or mesh size) would have been provided. The provisions of Article 
 
 - 58 48(3) were considered irrelevant from this point of view: by knowing only the area of catch 
no one can say if the fish was of a certain size without assuming that everybody complies 
with the rules in that area, which may not be the case. In addition, the fishing licence 
number is not recorded in any of the documents, and this may raise problems in the rapid 
identification of operators and quotas. Further, the recorded data for vessel identification is 
not consistent throughout the documents, and this may cause a problem when the vessel 
changes its registration name in a manner that facilitates IUU operations. Another weakness 
is the absence of recorded data with respect to conformity with management and 
conservation measures. Hence the legal provision is irrelevant with regard to especially 
unregulated fishing. In addition, the data required for identification of operator backwards 
and downwards are not consistently recorded, nor is the operation date. The ability to 
retrieve related data at each point becomes, thus, restricted. 
3. The IUU operations identification data ? are they traceable or not? There are no 
requirements in place for a unique identification number of the fishery product lots. This 
absence immediately and permanently hinders the traceability of products. 
4. Miscellaneous data related to traceability ? do they exist or not? Both the requirement to 
weigh the products on approved scales at all the critical control points covered by the legal 
text, and the requirement for a computerised validation system are in place. However, there 
are many openings for exemptions from all the requirements considered until now, by all 
parameters, and at all the control points covered by the norm, hampering thereby the 
unitary application of the law. Cross-references to other documents are poor, preventing the 
traceability system to work at its maximum. 
5. The IUU operations identification data ? are they retrieved or not for all the fishing 
vessels (covering jurisdiction of the norm)? The legal norm covers entirely the community 
vessels and partly the third country vessels (the later ones are subject to specific provisions 
in EU Regulation 1005/2008). However, it provides no coverage to vessels flying the flag 
of a Member State other than Community fishing vessels. Hence, no data can be retrieved 
from this kind of vessels under this regulation. If these vessels are engaged in IUU 
operations, the only way to stop them is by the Member state ensuring the control over its 
nationals; it is therefore important to retrieve the name of the owners of any vessels and to 
compare it against the existent black lists of IUU operations. 
 
 
 
 - 59 It is worth noting, even though it is not related to the model, that while analysing the legal 
provisions of this text it was realized that the allowable margin of error tolerance in the 
logbook with regard to volume of fish stored on board was raised from the 5% originally 
proposed (the European Commission Draft) to 10% (stated in the European Parliament 
legislative Resolution with respect to the Commission Draft).83 This decision indicates a 
higher tolerance towards catch that could be otherwise registered as illegal or unreported. 
 
Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by means of traceability. Analysis of EU 
Regulation 1005/2008. Model 1: Table 5. 
 
1. The IUU operations identification data ? do they cover or not all the critical control 
points? The legal text covers all the critical traceability control points at sea and at landing, 
but it covers only one such point at the onshore distribution chain. This exposes this last 
segment to possible infiltration of IUU fish. 
2. The IUU operations identification data ? do they exist or not (the data relevant for IUU 
operations identification is it stored in the carriages or not)? The requirements for data 
retrieval are inconsistent along the critical control points with respect to all parameters 
other than the weight of the product. This can hinder the traceability of data and products. 
There are just not enough data linked to the product to assess its non-IUU origin. 
3. The IUU operations identification data ? are they traceable or no? No single 
requirement is in place for a unique identification number of the fishery products. This 
hinders immediately and permanently the traceability of products. 
4. Miscellaneous data related to traceability ? do they exist or not? The weighing 
requirement is existent, but in an inconsistent manner, facilitating, thus, IUU fish 
infiltration. Further, the validation requirements exist only in two cases, and the credibility 
of the operations becomes questionable. Cross-references to other documents are scant, 
preventing the traceability system to work at its best level. On the other hand, the law does 
not provide many exemptions, ensuring therefore a more unitary application. 
5. The IUU operations identification data ? are they retrieved or not for all the fishing 
vessels (covering jurisdiction of the norm)? The legal norm covers entirely the Community 
vessels and the third country vessels. But again, it fails to cover the vessels flying the flag 
of a Member State other than Community?s fishing vessels. 
 
83 European Parliament legislative resolution of 22 April 2009 (T6-0255/2009), at 
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/oeil/file.jsp?id=5715242 (accessed: 09.05.2009). 
 
 - 60 4.3.3 Model 2: Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability results 
The results displayed in Table 6 can be interpreted from one perspective: are any chain of 
custody requirements included in EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 
2008/0216 (CNS)? The overall outcome is that, with some few exceptions, there are no 
such requirements incorporated in the legal text. As a consequence ?black fish? has the 
possibility to infiltrate into the legitimate trade. The analysis reveals that there are some 
rules in both legal texts that lay a certain basis for a chain of custody (e.g. the designation 
of the responsible authority; the keeping of records for a minimum of X years), but they are 
only isolated cases. Moreover, the EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) is a step 
ahead of EU Regulation 1005/2008, by imposing the existence of a label requirement. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 61  
5. DISCUSSION AND CONCLUSIONS 
 
5.1 Discussion 
5.1.1 The Models 
Though designed to address various purposes of the new Common Fisheries Policy, the aim 
of the Regulations was, allegedly, the ambition to put up a comprehensive traceability 
system as a management tool to deter IUU fishing activities. Both EU Regulation 
1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) are regulatory type norms, to be 
obligatorily incorporated into in the legal system of all member states. Therefore, their 
provisions have to be clear and specific. 
 
The aim of this study was to assess if the legal requirements fit the purpose of the law, that 
is if the evidence found in the texts indicates a comprehensive traceability system or not. 
This is a novel approach to both EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 
2008/0216 (CNS) from a dual perspective: IUU fishing deterrence and traceability. So far, 
extensive studies have been carried out to assess the impact of the first norm on EU trade 
with third parties, particularly developing countries (e.g. Tsamenyi, M. et al. (2009) ? 
Fairer Fishing? The Impact on developing countries of the European Community 
Regulation on IUU Fisheries; Tsamenyi, M. et al. (2008) ? Development impact of the 
Council Regulation establishing a European Community system to prevent IUU fishing on 
Commonwealth ACP Member countries). Within the EU some research is also being done 
with respect to the operational implementation of the same norm (e.g. Larsen, E.P. (2009) ? 
Traceability in the Danish fish sector). The question of the applicability of the laws still 
stands, as little or no research seems to be published on this subject. Nevertheless, the 
clarification of this particular issue was not an objective that the present study set out to 
analyse. 
 
The two models suggested here are preliminary, and both may need further refinement. 
Model 1 ?Acquisition of IUU fishing identification data by means of traceability? could be 
made more comprehensive. For this purpose the analysis of the catch documents proposed 
by RFMOs could be included, as Article 13 Regulation 1005/2008 assimilates them to the 
catch certificates defined in Article 12. To gain profoundness, more IUU fishing data 
identifiers could be specified. Moreover, identifiers could be divided into several 
 
 - 62 categories: technical identifiers, trade operators? identifiers, vessel identifiers, or others, in 
order to improve detail. Model 2 ?Assurance of chain of custody by means of traceability? 
could gain resolution if each group of general critical traceability points was broken down 
into more specific components, like ?at sea: catching, transhipment?. This would improve 
clarity and accuracy. The chain of custody parameters could also be disaggregated into subcomponents in order to improve depth of analysis. 
 
In spite of their limitations, both Model 1 and 2 could be used to analyse, and rate 
accordingly, any legal text that puts into place a traceability system for the fish supply 
chain. Moreover, Model 1 could be used not only for analysing a legal norm, but also be 
applied to any singular document required at critical traceability control points. In a similar 
way, Model 2 could be used to analyse a self-standing traceability system implemented by 
any company. Because the rating system is straightforward, as existence and non-existence 
are not matters of interpretation but of strict identification, both models are replicable. 
Thus, anyone following the named method should achieve identical results, provided that 
the same predictors are used and identical requirements of the chain of custody are adopted. 
 
The comprehensive display and the multitude of inferences that can be made are probably 
the strongest assets of the models used. Nevertheless, at some point their wideness and 
depth could be also the weakest asset, as the multiple-entry format may seem intricate to 
some. However, being a three fold study (IUU fishing, traceability, EU law), the chosen 
method seems to be appropriate, as it enables the integration of all the data in a readable, 
predictable and parsimonious manner. 
 
Based on the results of Model 1, this study reveals that the data necessary for identification 
of the IUU fish and operators is not constantly recorded at each critical traceability point by 
the documents required by EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) and EU Regulation 
1005/2008. Thus, the data traceability scheme can only deficiently, if hardly, be used in the 
deterrence of IUU operations. Moreover, the unique identification requirement does exist 
neither in EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), nor in EU Regulation 1005/2008. 
Thus, the system fails to fulfil the mandatory requirement of a traceability scheme. 
 
 
 
 - 63 Based on the results of Model 2, this study reveals that the traceability system put in place 
by EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) does not fulfil 
the chain of custody requirements. It is, thus, also deemed weak and useless for deterrence 
of IUU fishing. 
 
5.1.2 Eco-labelling and IUU fish traceability 
As presented in Chapter 3.2.4 of this paper, the eco-labelling certification process consists 
of two steps: fishery certification and chain of custody certification of all individual 
companies that will use the eco-label logo on their products. During the first step, the 
certification body assures inter alia that the fishery and actors are not engaged in IUU 
operations. Therefore, an eco-labelled certified fishery is to be assumed exempt of IUU 
fishing, and products originating from it are deemed non-IUU commodities. The 
information gathered during the pre-pre-assessment and pre-assessment phases of this step 
could be used by public authorities to define their strategies with respect to IUU fishing84. 
 
During the second step, the certification body verifies that a certified product originates 
from a certified fishery and is not mixed with non-certified products. This will ensure that 
?black fish? will not be mixed with the ?white? one, at any point of the custody chain. In 
the end, the consumer buying an eco-labelled product is to remain assured that the 
purchased fish is not coming from IUU operations. 
 
Most of the eco-labelling schemes have chain of custody certification requirements, but 
they are either weak or too general, with the exception of the Marine Stewardship Council 
(MSC) scheme.85 This scheme defines parameters to be checked by the certification body, 
and only if the requirements of these parameters are fulfilled at all individual companies 
along the chain of custody the certification is awarded. In practice, the representative of the 
certification body should visit on site all the individual companies along the custody chain, 
not only their head quarters, and check all the requirements of the chain of custody 
certification. 
 
In this context, the most important challenges for eco-labels schemes to ensure the 
traceability of the chain of custody, and helping deter IUU fishing, would be: 
 
84 Carleton, C. (2009), pages 12-13. 
85 Olsen, P. (2009) 2, page 17. 
 
 - 64 - Developing measurable standards for chain of custody certification. In this respect, 
there are examples of efficient and non-efficient practice. For instance, the standards 
of ?Friend of the sea? are non-measurable ? e.g. ?The Organization guarantees that 
a specific traceability system is in place in order to demonstrate that the product 
audited respects all requirements of this Standard and there is no possibility of mix 
with other products not under certification.?86 On the contrary, the standards of 
MSC seem measurable ? e.g. ?Sales invoice able to be linked to certified products 
and batches?.87 
- Make sure that the certification body assesses all the involved individual 
companies on site. 
 
5.1.3 Authentication/genetic traceability and IUU fishing deterrence 
Identifying the species to which a fish sample or product belongs is maybe the first 
application of genetic traceability. Often used to discover mislabelled products, the species 
authentication combined with conventional traceability can actually indicate the IUU fish. 
For example, if the product is labelled as swordfish but is identified to be mako shark, this 
is a case of mislabelling. If the investigation checks the documents that followed the 
product along the custody chain, it may be discovered that in the catch area it is legal to 
catch swordfish, but not mako sharks. In this case, the genetic trace would be necessary, 
together with conventional traceability, to identify IUU fish. 
 
With regard to fish stocks (exploited populations of a commercial species) and 
identification88 of their geographic origin, even the most advanced techniques of genetic 
analysis may not always provide unequivocal evidence. Genetic variation among 
populations reflects levels of gene exchange among spawning stocks, and in principle it is 
possible to allocate fish to the right stock of origin, even if only in a probabilistic sense. A 
complication may arise, however, when fish form e.g. feeding aggregations. These may be 
composed of multiple evolutionary populations, a mixture that is often found. 
Consequently, molecular markers may be used to trace an individual salmon to the specific 
river drainage where it hatched, but not to where it was caught. Therefore, the method can 
 
86 Friend of the Sea fishery check list at http://host1.bondware.com/~fos/news.php?viewStory=74 (accessed: 
09.05.2009). 
87 Application form for MSC ?Chain of Custody? Certification, developed by MacAlister Elliott and Partners 
Ltd (http://www.macalister-elliott.com/msc_certification/; accessed: 09.05.2009). 
88 Ogden, R. (2008), page 466. 
 
 - 65 hardly be used to detect IUU provenience with regard to area of catch, gear used, time of 
catch, and other controls. Vary often genetic identification techniques can simply not reveal 
these data. An additional flaw of genetic analysis is that it is sometimes difficult to resolve 
?true? independent stock units. This is the case when even small amounts of gene flow 
between stocks blur their genetic make-up.89 This is not infrequent, even for stocks that 
were positively identified as possessing separated spawning populations by means of other 
classical methods. In this case, it may be difficult to prove both the area of catch and the 
stock origin. 
 
On the other hand, genetic traceability90 at any point in the food supply chain is restricted to 
demonstrating product receipt from one stage up in the chain and product provision to one 
stage down in the chain. This logic removes the requirement for molecular genetic markers 
to identify samples; instead they can be employed to exclude samples. Exclusion is simpler 
than identification, as it does not require the same level of comparative population data or 
statistical interpretation. By screening a batch of fish at any point in the supply chain, 
subsequent adulteration can be detected by resampling. This can help uncover genetic 
material that was not present in the original batch. Dense supply chain sampling allows 
identification of the exact point at which illegal fish entered the chain. From a practical 
fisheries perspective, such methods would not use DNA markers for tracing individual fish, 
but instead use markers that characterize the genetic variation found within approved 
fisheries. For example, microsatellite panels currently used to identify farmed salmon 
broodstock from different suppliers could also be used to demonstrate changes in the 
genetic composition of a batch of fish as it becomes infiltrated with IUU products along the 
supply chain. The scale of sampling required would then be restricted to that typically used 
to provide a comprehensive estimate of allele frequencies in a population genetic study. In 
addition to enabling enforcement authorities to investigate IUU activity, genetic tracing 
also provides a method that can be employed by the fisheries industry, or independent 
certification schemes, to demonstrate the source of specific products. 
 
 
 
 
89 ICES WGAGFM (2009), page 11. 
90 Ogden, R. (2008), page 468. 
 
 - 66 The EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) took into consideration all these aspects. 
But, owing to the cost entailed by traceability tools such as genetic analysis, it was decided 
for the moment to only carry out pilot projects that broaden the research and information 
base for future measures (Article 13 New Technologies). 
 
5.1.4 Facilitating the traceability of fishery products 
In order to facilitate the usage of traceability as a management tool in deterrence of IUU 
operations, some measures could be implemented, including: 
 
? The introduction of internationally coordinated customs codes.91 Where a species 
subject to international trade is threatened by IUU fishing, the introduction of this kind 
of codes would enable a more accurate assessment of the trade. Also, improved 
coordination of product-specific codes between countries engaged in the trade of a 
species would greatly assist in reducing the errors in converting processed weights to 
live weight. 
? The development of clear, parameterised international standards of fish/fishery 
traceability (an example of such standard developed at EU level is CEN/CWA 
14660:2003-Traceability of fishery products: Specification on the information to be 
recorded in captured fish distribution chains). 
? Wherever possible, the conventional traceability system should be backed up by 
authentication/genetic traceability. 
? The problem of transhipment must be addressed seriously and actively because it is a 
very weal link in the chain of custody. Port States should be more demanding with 
regard to accountability of landings. Where fish being landed, or trafficked, lacks full 
accountability by internationally recognized standards, the whole operation should be 
treated as suspicious. Even if the fish unaccounted for represents just a part of the total 
volume. 
? Real time update of IUU fishing black/white lists. 
? Monitoring systems should be improved, for example by ensuring that devices cannot 
be disabled, or the data tampered with.92 
? Catch documentation schemes should be implemented more widely, together with trade 
documentation schemes. It should be ensured that documentation accompany the fish in 
 
91 OECD (2004), page 73. 
92 OECD (2004), page 391. 
 
 - 67 trade, starting from the point it is caught, all the way through the time it reaches the 
consumer. These systems should be implemented with priority in important markets 
(Japan, Chinese Taipei) and ports, especially ports of convenience (Las Palmas, Spain; 
Port Louis, Mauritius).93 
 
5.2 Conclusions 
Primary analyses: 
 
? Novel and comprehensive methods were developed to analyse the connexion between 
IUU fishing deterrence and the fish traceability scheme put in place by the EU 
Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS), using the caseordered predictor-outcome N-way matrix method. 
? Although replicable, the models developed are preliminary, and further refinement can 
improve their applicability. 
? Neither EU Regulation 1005/2008 nor EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) has 
the power to effectively use traceability to deter IUU fishing: 
 the traceability system set up is not viable, as it lacks the uniqueidentification requirement; 
 the product data required by law is either insufficient or irrelevant to 
scrutinize IUU fishing actors or products; 
 the law does not assure the chain of custody traceability. 
? Further studies can improve the suggested model under a de lege ferenda approach, i.e. 
designing a traceability system that can effectively be used in deterrence of IUU 
operations. 
? Eco-labelling of fish products is a viable way of deterring IUU fishing through its 
fishery certification and chain of custody components, provided that measurable 
standards for chain of custody certification are developed and the certification body 
assesses all the involved individual companies on site. 
? Genetic traceability/authentication alone, although promising, still has moderate 
applicability in the deterrence of IUU operations. To improve effectiveness it must be 
used complementarily with the conventional traceability systems. 
 
93 OECD (2004), page 392. 
 
 - 68  genetic traceability of the species/stocks is the easiest and clear application 
of this tool in IUU fishing deterrence; 
 fish stock and geographic origin identification by means of genetic 
traceability are not conclusive for identification of IUU fish; 
 genetic traceability at any point in the food supply chain may be an 
application that facilitates IUU fish identification, provided that a genetic 
database of reference exists; 
 the EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) takes into account the new 
genetic technologies, but owing to their cost these are still not operational. 
 
Related findings: 
 
? The provisions EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 (CNS) regarding the logbook are 
insufficient to deal with unreported fishing. 
? The provisions of EU Regulation 1005/2008 and EU Regulation Proposal 2008/0216 
(CNS) leave outside their jurisdiction fishing vessels flying a flag of a Member State 
other than Community vessels. 
? The multitude of exemptions offered by both legal texts may easily lead to a nonunitary application of the law. 
? The introduction of internationally coordinated customs codes and the development of 
clear, parameterised international standards of fish/fishery traceability are just a few 
examples of fishery management measures that can be taken to facilitate the traceability 
of fisheries products. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 69  
REFERENCES 
 
? Aarnisalo, K.; Heiskanen, S.; Jaakkola, K.; Landor, E. & Raaska, L. (2007) 
Traceability of foods and foodborne hazards, Espoo, VTT Tiedotteita Research Notes 
2395; 
? Agnew, D.J.; Pearce, J.; Pramod, G.; Peatman, T.; Watson, R. et al. (2009) Estimating 
the Worldwide Extent of Illegal Fishing, PLoS ONE 4(2): e4570. 
doi:10.1371/journal.pone.0004570; 
? Bollen, A.F.; Riden, C.P. and Opara, L.U. (2006) Traceability in postharvest quality 
management, Int. J. Postharvest Technology and Innovation 1/2006. 
? Bray, K. (2000) A global review of illegal, unreported and unregulated fishing, FAO; 
? CAC/GL 60-2006 Principles for traceability / product tracing as a tool within a food 
inspection and certification system, available at 
http://www.codexalimentarius.net/web/standard_list.do?lang=en; 
? Carleton, C. (2009) Do eco-labels have an impact on public institutions/policy 
making?, Round Table on Eco-Labelling and Certification in the Fisheries Sector, The 
Hague, Netherlands; 
? Dalvit, C.; Marchi, M.D. and M. Cassandro (2007) Genetic traceability of livestock 
products: A review, Meat Science, 77/2007; 
? Derrick, S.; Dillon, M. (2004) A guide to traceability within the fish industry, SIPPO, 
Eurofish, Humber Institute of Food & Fisheries; 
? EFTEC (2008) Cost of IUU fishing in EU fisheries, Economics for the Environment 
Consultancy Ltd, London; 
? EJF (2005) Pirates and profiteers: how pirate fishing fleets are robbing people and 
oceans, Environmental Justice Foundation, London, UK; 
? European Commission (2008) Commission staff working document SEC(2008) 2761, 
available at http://www.europarl.europa.eu/oeil/file.jsp?id=5715242; 
? EU Official Journal L31/1 (2002); 
? EU Official Journal L 286/1 (2008); 
? European Parliament legislative resolution of 22 April 2009 (T6-0255/2009), at 
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/oeil/file.jsp?id=5715242; 
? FAO (1995) Code of Conduct for responsible fisheries, Rome; 
 
 - 70 ? FAO (1997) Fisheries management, Technical Guidelines for Responsible Fisheries 
4/1997; 
? FAO (2001) 1 International Plan of Action to Prevent, Deter and Eliminate Illegal, 
Unreported and Unregulated Fishing, available at 
http://www.fao.org/DOCREP/003/y1224e/y1224e00.HTM 
? FAO (2001) 2 - Product certification and eco-labelling for fisheries sustainability, 
FAO Fisheries Technical Paper 422/2001; 
? FAO (2002) 1 Implementation of the International Plan of Action to prevent deter and 
eliminate IUU fishing, FAO Technical Guidelines for Responsible Fisheries 9/2002; 
? FAO (2002) 2 Stopping illegal, unreported and unregulated fishing, Rome; 
? FAO (2003) Fisheries management. 2. The ecosystem approach to management, 
Technical Guidelines for Responsible Fisheries 4/2003; 
? FAO (2009) Private standards in fisheries and aquaculture: current practice and 
emerging issues, Globefish Research Programme 97/ 2009; 
? FAO/WHO (2008) Procedural manual, Codex Alimentarius Commision; 
? Frederiksen, M. (2006) Introduction to traceability, FAO and Eurofish International 
Organisation Quality Assurance Challenges in the Seafood Industry, Copenhagen; 
? GS1 - The GS1 Traceability Standard: What you need to know, at www.gs1.org; 
? ICES WGAGFM (2009) Draft Report of the Working Group on the Application of 
Genetics in Fisheries and Mariculture. 
? Jacquet, J. L.; Pauly, D. (2008) Trade secrets: renaming and mislabelling of seafood., 
Marine Policy 32/2008; 
? Karlsen, K.M.; Olsen, P. and Storøy, J. (2006) TraceFish basert innføring av 
sporbarhet i norsk fiskerinæring, Fiskeriforskning, Rapport 11/2006; 
? Lupin, H. (2006) Traceability, FAO/FIIU available at 
http://www.globefish.org/filedownload.php?fileId=359 
? Martinez, I.; James, D.; Loréal, H. (2005) Application of modern analytical techniques 
to ensure seafood safety and authenticity, FAO Fisheries Technical Paper 455/2005; 
? Miles, M.B.; Huberman, A.M. (1994) Qualitative Data Analysis, Sage Publications; 
? Moe, T. (1998) Perspectives on traceability in food manufacture, Trends in Food 
Science & Technology 9/1998; 
? MRAG & University of British Columbia (2008) The global extent of illegal fishing; 
 
 - 71 ? MRAG (2005) Review of Impacts of Illegal, Unreported and Unregulated Fishing on 
Developing Countries, Marine Resources Assessment Group Ltd , London, UK; 
? OECD (2004) Fish piracy. Combating illegal, unreported and unregulated fishing; 
? OECD (2004) Why fish piracy persists.The economics of illegal, ynreported and 
unregulated fishing; 
? Ogden, R. (2008) Fisheries forensics: the use of DNA tools for improving compliance, 
traceability and enforcement in the fishing industry, Fish and fisheries 9/2008; 
? Olsen, P. (2009) 1 Food traceability process mapping. Standard method for 
amanlyzing material flow, information flow and information loss in food supply chains, 
in Donnelly, K. AM.; Olsen, P. Harmonising methods for food traceability process 
mapping and cost/benefit calculations related to implementation of electronic 
traceability systems, Nofima Report 15/2009; 
? Olsen, P. (2009) 2 Traceability: Definitions, drivers and standards, Round Table on 
Eco-Labelling and Certification in the Fisheries Sector, The Hague, Netherlands; 
? Opara, L.U. (2003) Traceability in agriculture and food chain: a review of basic 
concepts, technological implications, and future prospects Food, Agriculture & 
Environment 1/2003; 
? Onwuegbuzie, A.J.; Dickinson, W.B. (2008) Mixed methods analysis and information 
visualization: graphical display for effective communication of research results, The 
Qualitative Report 13/2008; 
? Pauly, D.; Christensen, V.; Guénette, S.; Pitcher, T.J.; Sumaila, R.; Walters, C.J.; 
Watson, R. and Zeller, D. (2002) Towards sustainability in world fisheries, in Nature 
418/2002, Nature Publishing Group, Macmillan Publishers Limited; 
? Philips, B.; Ward, T.; Chaffee, C. (2003) Eco-labelling in fisheries. What is it all 
about?, Blackwell Publishing; 
? Pitcher, T.J.; Kalikoski, D.; Pramod, G. and Short, K. (2008) Safe Conduct? Twelve 
years fishing under the UN Code; WWF; 
? Pitcher, T.J.; Kalikoski, D.; Pramod, G. (2006) Evaluations of compliance with the 
FAO (UN) Code of Conduct for responsible fisheries, Fisheries Centre Research 
Reports 14(2)/2006, Fisheries Centre, University of British Columbia, Canada; 
? Randrup, M. et al. (2008) - Simulated recalls of fish products in five Nordic countries, 
Food Control 19/2008; 
 
 - 72 ? Sumaila, R. (2008) The global state of IUU fishing. Regions, Quantities and values, 
The 2nd Global Fisheries Enforcement Training Workshop, Trondheim, Norway; 
? www.fisheries.ubc.ca/publications/reports/report14_2.php; 
? http://www.globefish.org/filedownload.php?fileId=359; 
? http://www.fao.org/DOCREP/003/y1224e/y1224e00.HTM; 
? http://www.sporfori.fo/InEnglish/Ontraceability/InternalExternalTraceability/tabid/109/Default.aspx; 
? http://www.fao.org/fishery/fishcode/en; 
? http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/; 
? http://www.codexalimentarius.net/web/standard_list.do?lang=en; 
? www.gs1.org; 
? http://www.europarl.europa.eu/oeil/file.jsp?id=5715242; 
? www.fisheries.ubc.ca/publications/reports/report14_2.php; 
? http://www.eubusiness.com/Fisheries/iuu-fishing-eu/; 
? http://www.bordbiavantage.ie/bordbia/preview.asp?pid=3&mid=11&cid=37&id=37; 
? http://www.iso.org/iso/iso_catalogue/faq_standards_2.htm; 
? www.wikipedia.com; 
? www.us.sgs.com/rd12.pdf; 
? www.msc.org; 
? http://host1.bondware.com/~fos/news.php?viewStory=74; 
? http://www.macalister-elliott.com/msc_certification/. 
 
 
 
 
 - 73 APPENDIX 1.94 Potential impacts of IUU fishing. 
 
94 OECD (2004), pages 197 and 199. 
 
 - 74 APPENDIX 2.95 
Groups of important economic and social drivers of IUU fishing activities: 
a. overcapacity in the global fishing fleet. Among developing countries, there is a growing 
concern that the overcapacity problems of developed countries will spill over into IUU 
fishing activities. Not offering scrapping incentives can also drive vessels-owners into IUU 
fishing. 
b. degree of MCS operations and their effect. The high cost of an efficient MCS system 
can hinder coastal states, especially the developing countries, to ensure the legal 
compliance in their EEZs. 
c. level of sanctions against IUU fishing. Limited enforcement and the absence of severe 
penalties can transform IUU fishing in a very profitable activity. The forfeiture of vessels 
and catch could sometimes be more of an impediment to IUU fishing than fines. 
d. management regimes. Countries with weak fisheries management regimes are more 
often a source of vessels for IUU operations than the ones with strong fisheries 
management. 
e. weak international legal framework. Voluntary binding soft international legislation or 
the lack of any legal provisions (e.g. safety and personnel requirements for fishing vessels 
etc.), tax havens, open vessels registries, all these are incentives for IUU fishing activities. 
f. unsatisfactory economical and social conditions of fishers. Poor livelihood conditions, 
particularly in developing countries, influence fishers to engage in IUU activities. 
g. market and value of the IUU fish. Most of the species targeted by IUU activities have a 
very high market value; therefore, the economic gains from IUU fishing are often 
substantial. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
95 OECD (2005), pages 37-40. 
 
 - 75 APPENDIX 396 
Available measures against IUU fishing activities 
All countries - States should ratify international legal instruments related to 
fisheries. 
- Countries whose vessels take part in fisheries regulated by RFMOs 
should become members of those organizations, or make their 
vessels fish in such a way that they do not undermine the rules 
created by those organizations. 
- Each country should review its own fishing laws and practices to 
see if they enable the use of all relevant tools in the IPOA-IUU. 
- Countries should improve their MCS capacity and participate in the 
International Network for the Cooperation and Coordination of 
Fisheries-Related Monitoring, Control and Surveillance Activities. 
- Governments can encourage fishers to comply with fishing rules 
through positive actions (community education and other outreach to 
fishers; ensuring that stakeholders participate in the development of 
fishery rules; fostering peer pressure in favour of compliance; 
creating systems for collecting information that are easy for fishers to 
use). 
- Countries should eliminate subsidies and other economic support, 
which contribute to the build-up of excess fishing capacity. 
- States have to take measures or cooperate to ensure that their 
nationals do not support or engage in IUU fishing. 
Flag countries 
(countries that register 
fishing vessels and 
authorize vessels to fly 
their flags) 
- The State has responsibility under international law to control the 
fishing activities of both fishing vessels and fishing support vessels 
(such as transport vessels that receive the catch of fishing vessels and 
supply vessels that bring fuel and provisions to fishing vessels), no 
matter where the vessel operates. 
- The State should ensure, before it registers a fishing vessel that it 
can exercise its responsibility to control that the vessel does not 
engage in IUU fishing. 
- The States should ensure that there is a strong link between the 
process by which they register fishing vessels and the process by 
which they grant authorizations to fish. 
- The States should register as many fishing vessels as possible, 
preferably all of them, and to enter all of them on its record of 
fishing vessels. 
- The States should require all chartering arrangements to be fully 
transparent. 
- The State should issue an authorization to fish only to a vessel 
properly registered in its territory and entered in its record of fishing 
vessels. 
- The States should prohibit their vessels from engaging in transshipment of fish at sea without prior authorization issued by the flag 
State. 
Coastal countries 
(countries that border 
ocean areas) 
- The State should: keep a record of foreign vessels authorized to fish 
in its waters; require foreign vessels to use VMS, such that the 
coastal country has real-time or near real-time access to vessel 
positions and receives regular data reports by VMS; require foreign 
vessels, or a certain percentage of them, to carry independent 
observers. 
 
 
96 Based on FAO (2002) 1 and FAO (2002) 2. 
 
 - 76 - The coastal State should request the flag State to guarantee that its 
vessels being licensed do not have a history of IUU fishing before 
licenses are issued by the coastal State. 
- Coastal countries should consider requiring that all trans-shipments 
take place in port or, at a minimum, require that trans-shipment at sea 
ought to be done in accordance with proper controls and at locations 
where inspectors can be present to check the details of the fish being 
trans-shipped. 
- A coastal State must work closely with other States and RFMOs on 
different levels. 
- The state should improve its MCS efforts. 
Port countries 
(countries to whose ports 
fishing vessels come) 
- A port State should require foreign fishing vessels seeking port 
access to provide at a minimum: reasonable advance notice of their 
entry into port; a copy of their authorization to fish; details of their 
fishing trip and quantities of fish on board. 
- If a port country has reasonable grounds for suspecting that a vessel 
in its port has engaged in IUU fishing, the port country should: not 
allow the vessel to land or trans-ship fish in its port; immediately 
report the matter to the flag country, and if the suspected IUU fishing 
may have taken place in another country?s waters or in waters 
regulated by a regional fishery organization, immediately report the 
matter to that country or organization. 
Regional Fishery 
Management 
Organizations 
Among things that regional fishery organizations can do are to: 
- collect and disseminate information relating to IUU fishing; 
- identify vessels that are engaging in IUU fishing and coordinate 
measures against them; 
- identify countries whose vessels are engaging in IUU fishing and 
can urge identified countries to correct such behaviour; 
- call on their members to take action against vessels without 
nationality that are fishing in the relevant region; 
- adopt rules to ensure that vessel chartering arrangements do not 
lead to IUU fishing; 
- adopt port inspection schemes, restrictions on trans-shipment at sea 
and schemes creating a presumption that fish harvested by nonmember vessels in the relevant region should not be permitted to be 
landed in ports of members; 
- adopt catch certification and/or trade documentation schemes; 
- adopt other market-related measures to combat IUU fishing. 
National Plans of Action 
 
The IPOA-IUU calls upon all countries to develop and adopt national 
plans of action to further achieve the objectives of the IPOA-IUU. 
Each country?s national plan of action should at least consider how 
each of the basic tools could be put to use in the fisheries in which it 
is involved. 
Market/Trade measures - Market-related measures cover several types of controls on the 
importation and exportation of goods, including: catch certification 
and trade documentation requirements; import and export restrictions 
and prohibitions; improvement of the transparency of their markets 
to allow the traceability of fish or fish products; eco-labelling. 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 77 APPENDIX 4. Relevant EU legislation for fish supply chain (the list is not exhaustive). 
 
Regulation 1829/2003/EU Genetically modified foods and feeds 
Regulation 1830/2003/EU Traceability and labelling of food products made from genetically 
modified organisms 
Directive 2001/18/EU Deliberate release of genetically modified organisms into the 
environment 
Directive 2001/95/EC General product safety 
Directive 93/43/EEC Hygiene of foodstuffs 
Directive 91/493/EEC Health conditions for the production and the placing on the market of 
fishery products 
Directive 89/396/EEC Indications or marks identifying the lot a foodstuff belongs to 
Directive 2003/89/EC Amending Directive 2000/13/EC as regards indication of the 
ingredients present in foodstuffs 
Regulation 2847/93/EEC Establishing a control system applicable to the Common Fisheries 
Policy 
Regulation 2371/2002/EEC On the conservation and sustainable exploitation of fisheries 
resources under the Common Fisheries Policy 
Regulation 104/2000/EC On the common organisation of the markets in fishery and 
aquaculture products 
Regulation 2092/91/EEC On organic production of agricultural products and indications 
referring thereto on agricultural products and foodstuffs 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 78 APPENDIX 597. Standards, certification schemes and labels operating in fisheries and aquaculture 
(the enumeration is not exhaustive). 98 
 
97 FAO (2009), pages 16-17. 
98 Note that animal welfare problematic is not addressed by any of these requirements, situation brought into 
attention of stakeholders during the Round Table on co-labelling and certification in fisheries sector, held in 
The Hague in April 2009. 
 
 - 79 APPENDIX 6.99 Guide to unique identification of traceable units 
 
In order to assure the efficiency of the traceability system, the traceable units have to be 
uniquely identified. Furthermore, a minimum of additional information has to be linked to 
the traceable units throughout their lifetime. Later on, these data may be accessed via the 
unique identification number. Common practice for creation of the smallest traceable unit 
varies in different industries. In the fish farming business a bucket of roe, a full 
containment of a well boat or a fish crate are typical TUs. In the capture fish sector, a crate 
of fish is a typical TU. 
 
The GS1100 numbering system 
 
GS1 administers a global number system for identification and description of items. 
Traceability standards recommend the use of the GS1 numbers for unique identification for 
TUs and LUs. The concept of the GS1 128 symbology is to code a set of data elements 
frequently used in trade and logistic (i.e. Net weight, Production date, etc) and explain the 
meaning of the data elements by using a prefix called an Application Identifier (AI). 
Hence, the AI identifies the meaning and the format of the data that follows it (data field). 
In the example data (3101) 05545, 3101 is the Application Identifier telling that this data 
element means Net weight with an accuracy of one decimal, and 05545 specifies the Net 
weight to be 554,5 Kg. 
 
The GS1 128 Symbology provides adequate predefined data elements to enable unique 
identification of both Trade Unit and Logistic Unit. 
 
Uniquely identifying the Logistic Unit 
 
GS1 provides a globally unique data element for the identification of a Logistic Unit, 
called SSCC (Serial Shipping Container Code). A pallet of fish crates or 20 meters 
containers of fish are typical logistic units. Traceability standards require that the IDs of 
 
99 http://www.tracefood.org/index.php/GTP:Unique_Identification (accessed: 01.05.2009). 
100 GS1 is a global organization which main activity is the development of the GS1 System, a series of 
standards designed to improve supply chain management. The GS1 Identification System provides two types 
of identifiers. The first or primary identifiers are called GS1 Keys like the Global Trade Item Number 
(GTIN) or Global Location Number (GLN). (www.gs1.com, accessed: 02.05.2009). 
 
 - 80 the separate TU?s within the LU shall be linked to the LU identifier, in practice to the 
SSCC. 
 
The SSCC number structure is (00) 235467985462312345, were 00 is the Application 
Identifier and the following figure is an 18 digit unique number. 
 
Uniquely identifying the Trade Unit 
 
The GS1 128 Symbology does not have one single data element for the unique 
identification of a Trade Unit (i.e. a particular fish crate). However the symbology provides 
a trade item number, named GTIN, which identifies a variant of Trade Units (i.e. crate of 
20 Kg fresh Superior Atlantic salmon of 4-5 kg each fish). GTIN is an abbreviation for 
Global Trade Item Number. 
 
To uniquely identify the particular crate, one has to add one or more predefined data 
elements. In the traceability standards this identifier is called GTIN+, where the + indicates 
that additional information is needed for this purpose. 
 
To make up the GTIN+, the GTIN (AI 01) must be combined either with a Batch number 
(AI 10) and a Serial number (AI 21), or only with the Date and time of production (AI 
8008). 
 
GS1 defines the Batch number as an internal number of a production batch. It is common 
practice to allocate this number to all produced units with similar properties (i.e. origin / 
farm area, time of arrival, supplier, etc) and/or produced within a certain time period (i.e. 
one hour, a shift, one day, one week, etc). Since most commonly many Trade Units are 
given the same Batch number, unique identification of each separate Trade Unit demands 
further specification. An appropriate solution is to allocate a Serial Number to each 
produced Trade Unit (i.e. a meat crate). 
 
Using example data, the GTIN+ applying the Batch- and Serial number looks as follows: 
 
(01)07038010000065(10)123456(21)1234567890 
 
 
 - 81 The second alternative is to make up a unique identification of a Trade Unit by combining 
the GTIN and Date and Time of production (AI 8008). 
 
Exemplified with real data GTIN+ may be presented as follows: 
 
(01)07038010000065(8008)040915125603 
 
The figures behind AI (8008) have a structured format, meaning year/ month/ time/ 
minute/ second. 
 
In some cases a Logistic Unit and a Trade Unit will be of equal size (i.e. a full containment 
of a cargo boat carrying grain). 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 - 82 APPENDIX 7101. Additional types of operations/transformations of traceable units and 
their linked data. 
1. Addition. During processing, additional 
ingredient(s) are added to the product. Since the 
ID-code is still unique to the product, it is 
continued to be used although the processing 
records should identify the ID-code(s) of the 
ingredient(s) used. 
Example: Brining operation. The same ID-code 
would be kept by the fish after this process step, 
although the processing records would show the 
ID-code of the salt used to produce the brine (as 
well as brine strength, time pf processing etc.) 
 
3. Grouping. Trade units are grouped in a 
logistic unit. The ID-codes of the separate TU?s 
within the LU shall be linked to the LU 
identifier. 
Example: A slaughterhouse has defined the 
day?s production of slaughtered salmon as a 
batch. The batch is splitted to be packed in 
crates (TUs), and the crates are arranged on 
pallets (LUs). 
 
4. Un-grouping. Logistic trades are un-grouped 
in trade units. The ID-codes of the separate TUs 
from within the LU have to be linked to the LU 
identifier. 
Example: A slaughterhouse produces pallets 
(LUs) with crates (TUs) of 3-4 kg and 5-6 kg 
fresh salmon. The LUs are transported to a 
distribution terminal. One client wants 5? 
pallets with crates of 3-4 kg, and 3? pallets with 
crates of 5-6 kg. The pallets are un-packed, the 
crates counted and packed again. 
 
 
 
101 Based on Karlsen, K.M.; Olsen, P. and J. Storøy (2006), pages 11-12, and Derrick, S.; Dillon, M. (2004), 
pages13-14. 
